A big return for the Czech loser is approaching.
Pavel Francouz has been called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goaltender Pavel Francouz, who is going through a difficult period in his career, is returning to the NHL.
The 31-year-old native of Pilsen will be on the bench and could soon find himself in goal.
The former Litvínov, Plzeň and Russian Chelyabinsk goalkeeper was injured during preparation for the NHL in October this year.
He was subbed out in the middle of the game against Vegas and has not played in the NHL since.
The incident occurred as the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to the other.
"Pavel Francouz will be out approximately three to four weeks with a lower-body injury," the Avalanche announced in early October.
His return to the NHL net ended up lasting more than two months.
Called up from the farm on Sunday morning U.S. time, he threw four innings and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he recorded 94.5% of his saves.
The former Plzeň hockey player wants to finally make it and prove that he belongs in the best league in the world.
In the last season, he had problems with his hip and in the shortened pandemic season, he didn't play a single game.
In the NHL, "Francík" played 36 matches, his success rate is 92.3%.
Charles puts Camilla in a mask on Christmas card, William and Kate pose in Jordan
British Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photo taken during their trip to Jordan as this year's Christmas card.
Prince Charles also shared his wish, using a photo in which he helps his wife, Camilla, put on a mask at the races.
The British Broadcasting Corporation (BBC) reported this on its website.
The wishes are sent to friends, colleagues and the charities they work with.
The photo was taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge is dressed in a long khaki summer dress, as is Princess Charlotte.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing shorts and a shirt with a collar, just like Princes George and Louis.
It is not clear who took the photograph or when it was taken.
Last year the royal family posed for their Christmas card photograph on a bale of straw in front of a pile of logs at their country home in Norfolk.
The image, which will be used as a Christmas card, was also released by the heir to the throne, Prince Charles, and his wife Camilla.
Photographer Sam Hussein caught him at the races in Ascot in June.
Charles, wearing a trilby hat and a face mask, helps Camille put on her face mask, which matches her light-coloured dress.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbr a million for the title. Tvrdík denied this.
Prague - The investigators in the current corruption case reportedly worked with the assumption that the accused former vice-president of the Football Association of the Czech Republic, Roman Berbr, had been promised one million Czech crowns from the Prague Slavia for the league title in the 2018/19 season.
The efotbal.cz website reported this, adding that it had access to part of the police files.
The chairman of the board of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the red-and-whites did not engage in any corruption.
The server published a transcript of the police wiretaps, in which Slavia is mainly represented by its former sports director Jan Nezmar, who left the club last summer.
According to the indictment, the former influential official of the red-and-whites was in frequent contact with Berbr, as well as with the former sports director of the then second-league Vyšehrad Roman Rogoz, who is also among the accused in the case.
The detectives were reportedly working with information that Slavia had promised Berbatov a financial reward for winning the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Prague team won the first league title.
The police authority was in possession of the knowledge that Roman (Berbr) was promised a million-crown bribe from the officials of SK Slavia Prague for winning the league, the server cited from the file.
The following day, according to the police, Berbr met not only with Nezmara, but also with the chairman of Slavia's board of directors, Tvrdík.
According to the server, it is not clear from the file whether the police are still dealing with this information.
Tvrdík has denied any corruption.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the situation in Czech football and we offered an alternative to its development.
We have never committed an illegal act, we have not tried to influence the referees in violation of the fair play rules, and we have not provided anyone with any financial compensation in connection with this," Tvrdík told Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar, among other things, indiscriminately insults some former dark-skinned Slavia players and also slanders his former boss, Tvrdík.
The case of alleged match-fixing through referees was sparked by a police raid in mid-October last year, at several locations including the headquarters of the FAČR in Prague.
Berbr is the highest-ranking person involved in the affair, who no longer holds any football positions.
Like former Vyšehrad sports director Rogoz, he was released from custody in mid-January.
Helicopters, tanks, and BVPs are LARPing the Cold War.
The tanks will be new, but essentially of a worse type (the gunners will have to fire from an armoured cabin and carry ammunition by hand without cover).
The vehicles - Toyota Hi-luxes - are new and good
Trucks and various armoured vehicles - at a decent level, moreover, it has managed to get rid of the Praga V3S in specialist units.
Aircraft: combat - decent, but at the end of the lease, transport - too small with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and small types with no combat potential
Rockets - we don't have any at all (but we manufacture them and export them overseas)
NGO: medium - cold war, obsolete; short range - good, modern, relatively good numbers.
I have a story.
My hunting grounds are right next to the city.
The nutria were coming out of the river and causing damage to the crops, so I sat there.
When I arrived, I saw that there was a fisherman on the other side of the river.
I didn't want to make a scene, so I sat down quietly and the guy probably didn't notice me.
I was hoping that he would leave before something came out, but of course the fox was soon out of the henhouse.
I let her get to 40 metres before I decided to shoot.
The poor fisherman nearly had a heart attack, he was waving his torch all over the place, so I called out to him that it was a fox.
By the time I got off the bench, I was livid.
That is to say, a man can be a prat.
On the other hand, it's not war, it would have to be a series of coincidences for something to happen, you'd probably be seen on a thermal imaging camera, which almost everyone has today.
So put your valuables in a visible place, put them in your sleeping bag, and you should be fine.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of the Interior procured respirators much more cheaply than the Ministry of Health
The state, responsible for purchasing and distributing face masks, masks and respirators for professions closest to the coronavirus, has spent billions of crowns on their purchase in recent weeks.
The iRozhlas server compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that the prices of respirators differed by hundreds of crowns on a single day.
Why did the prices fluctuate so dramatically?
Which authorities have been frugal?
And why did others buy at a higher price?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to iRozhlas editor Dominika Kubištová.
I respect the soldiers and the army (I am probably not affected by the memories of the former Czechoslovak Army, which the older generations went through), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't even have large stockpiles of equipment that reservists could pick up, we don't even have modern equipment for the current professionals, and on top of that modern equipment is getting more and more complicated, so the reservists' skills will rapidly decline over time.
On top of that, modern conventional conflicts, where anyone can be deployed, will play out very quickly, there will be no time to retrain someone.
And finally, the reserves/territorial defense have a big role to play in countries like Ukraine, where leading a mass guerrilla war is a stated necessity to deter the enemy.
In the territory of the Czech Republic, it will only be possible to fight in a conflict of such a scale and intensity that the guerrilla will be irrelevant, and we do not have the right geography for that.
Mainly, we don't have individual skills.
This is not even the worst of it.
The worst thing is that half of them play like they have it.
Then comes a situation where you look like an idiot, who 2 minutes ago didn't hit an empty net, drives into the attack alone between 2 or even 3 Swiss players, and you ask yourself "what do you think is going to happen now?"
Of course, they're going to treat him like an average taxpayer.
The situation with this skill "to take on a defender" is so bad that I caught myself being genuinely surprised when I saw that our attacker managed to beat one of the opponent's players.
First signs
The Covid-19 pandemic is slowing down, but experts do not expect any major developments in the coming weeks.
The pressure on hospitals will continue for some time, according to statistical models, and a new unknown has been added to the pandemic equation: the omicron variant, which is very likely to spread faster than the currently dominant Delta.
At the same time, it is not yet possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course of the disease, or to what extent vaccination or post-infection immunity acquired from a previous infection helps against it.
This week, however, an unexpected phenomenon on the plus side has entered the covid equation: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug has arrived in the Czech Republic, the antiviral molnupiravir, which reduces the risk of a severe course of the disease and associated hospitalisation by a third, and can be taken at home.
Soon it will be joined by the Pfizer drug paxlovid, which, according to preliminary results, is successful in up to 85 percent of cases.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, in addition to the hope of expanding the portfolio of useful tools in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, have also highlighted the question of how the Czech administration is prepared for incoming drugs.
As mentioned, the first drug to reach Czech patients will be molnupiravir by Merck.
The company ended up on the tape first because the drug was being developed long before the current pandemic to find a suitable treatment for a viral disease in horses on the South American continent.
What is often overlooked in these studies is that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
are generally less open and do not openly share their opinions.
On the other hand, Eastern Europeans, and especially we Czechs, are used to saying "as if a beak had grown on our noses".
So you do research where you ask people if they like Muslims.
In the Czech Republic, most people will tell you straight up that they don't.
In the West, they will tell you how much they like migration, how we should all help them, and how we Czechs are racist pigs.
And then they go and vote for parties like the AfD.
They fear cancel culture, saying this in public means losing your job and media lynching.
Then it looks nice in the polls, West good, East bad.
But they will find out what people really think.
In France, Le Pen and Zemmour both have more than 20%, according to the poll.
We even know that the objects are three in number and completely identical.
Identical due to the rotation of units, so that the soldiers do not have to learn where everything is again, all the buildings are almost the same.
One of them is the Atom Muzeum Brdy and the other two are abandoned.
It is funny that the USSR did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory, either for security reasons or because of the speed of deployment of the warheads due to its more western location.
Only the warheads were stored in the underground bunkers (there were two in each maple tree), not the entire missiles.
If it was necessary to use this weapon, a special unit would arrive, pick up the head and mount it on some kind of carrier.
Aside from the museum sycamore, the rest are in a state of disrepair.
At the second stage of elementary school, we had a Gypsy classmate, and we were together for 4 years.
He was pretty good, he made some good jokes, he was a bit over the top, but he was like our mascot.
Everyone talked to him, he often came and wanted to explain something, he was almost always here, he did sports with us, he didn't steal our snacks or phones, he came dressed properly.
He also went on nature schools, did all kinds of monkey business, but he was fine, probably never got into any trouble.
In the eighth or ninth grade, the siblings entered the same grade, different classes.
Shortly thereafter, they beat up a teacher, the police were often called there, they threatened and intimidated other students...
I personally sometimes sell something on a classified ad (old things, things I don't need, etc.) and I've sold to Gypsies many times, they always had money, they didn't try to trick me out of the price, the communication was calm.
I have even sold a car this way, a guy called me a month later, saying that he had already transferred it to himself...
I say to myself that I'm not a racist, I don't care if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or any other colour, as long as they behave as they should in decent society (works, functions, doesn't beat women, just normal behaviour).
But as soon as someone comes, stretches out their hand, evicts flats and houses, has a mess around them and causes problems... it doesn't matter what colour they are, but it will bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants if they integrate here, start a business, work, learn the language (not necessarily, at least English), and respect our culture.
If they believe in Allah, I don't care, as long as they respect my traditions and culture, I will respect theirs.
A young woman died in a car crash in Prachatice
"The young woman suffered multiple serious injuries and despite resuscitation efforts, she unfortunately died from her injuries at the scene," the spokesperson for the South Bohemian ambulance service, Zuzana Fajtlová, told Právo.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who was transporting the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of the Peugeot was probably driving from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov and, for unknown reasons, left the road in a bend.
After the collision with the Skoda Octavia, the Peugeot ended up on its roof off the road, said South Bohemian police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová.
The young Peugeot driver suffered very serious injuries in the accident.
It was multiple injuries and he was trapped in the car.
After being freed, he had to be provided with emergency pre-hospital care, and was airlifted to the hospital in České Budějovice in a stable condition, said rescuer Fajtlová.
She added that the man in the second car suffered a minor chest injury and was taken to hospital.
New rules apply to parcels from outside the EU, customers often fail to provide information about them
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
He mainly gets collector's cards.
"Usually it can be dozens of dollars, say, from ten dollars or more, where it is still worthwhile to import, especially from Japan, where postage is often free," says the collector.
Since October, ordering small packages has become slightly more expensive; he now has to add VAT and give customs information to the post office.
He will receive an e-mail stating that customs are awaiting the arrival of the package.
Then you just have to fill in the information about the shipment, and if the seller did not include VAT in the sale, the customs office will collect it from the total amount of the shipment and transport.
If the recipient does not take care of customs procedures themselves, they must add the carrier's fee to the total amount.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I check one or two boxes, add two attachments, and I'm done.
For me, it's usually a matter of five minutes, says Neuheisl.
Not all deliveries go smoothly though.
Due to new customs regulations, the daily number of parcels received from abroad at the international post office in Prague fell from 60,000 to 15,000.
According to the Czech Post Office, the problem is also that people do not react to calls to submit information necessary to complete the customs procedure.
Currently, there are 30,000 parcels awaiting processing at the international post office.
If people were to fill in all the information that is required and fill it in on time, we would be about halfway there, says Matyáš Vitík, spokesman for the Czech Post.
The solution to inflation
See the title, how would you propose to solve the current inflation?
Currently, we have 9.9% inflation, and it is expected to rise further.
What do you think should be done to slow this growth or compensate for it?
For example, in Poland we see a reduction in VAT on food and PHM. Is this the way forward for you?
What do you think is going to happen that is inevitable with where it's headed?
Prices are growing faster than wages, and it's inevitable that people won't be able to afford basic things, especially energy.
How much were you given, for example, added (who is an employee)?
I got a 2% rise this year, which is a joke, but luckily I have a similar income from the business I run alongside my job.
Could anyone explain to me why proven violent offenders are being sent to prison for as little as 6 months?
I just can't get my head around how a court can put such a monster behind bars for just six months only for them to do it again as soon as they get out.
6 months is nothing compared to the fact that his/her victim will have the trauma for years, negatively affecting their sexual relationships and relationships in general.
Not to mention that the victim of a rape does not have to recover from it.
What about potential future victims of sexual assault?
A man from Hrob "pierced" his girlfriend from Kostomlaty
The man from Hradec Králové unintentionally helped the police officers to secure his nationwide wanted girlfriend from Kostomlaty nad Labem, who had a warrant for her arrest.
He summoned her himself.
However, he did so in a roundabout way.
First, he approached a passer-by and made up a story that he had been robbed.
Officers responding to the 911 call arrived on scene and were stunned when the alleged "victim" told them he made the whole thing up to get officers to come to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to ask the officers how to file a report with the Czech Police.
After checking the identity of the man and his companion, the officers discovered that the woman was on the list of wanted persons, in a nationwide search, and an arrest warrant had been issued for her.
The case is therefore being handled by the Czech police.
A genuine question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
I personally hold the view that the Slavs are no longer ethnically or culturally Slavs, but I would like to hear your opinion.
Otherwise, I agree with the meme. It is a shame that Churchill did not manage to secure the liberation of Prague by the USA.
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's a bit of a question whether a rational person can really believe something without evidence, just because it might be beneficial.
I personally would not consider such a case to be true faith.
I cannot agree with Pascal on this, as there are, if I am not mistaken, an estimated ten thousand different religions in the world.
Which god or gods should a person then choose?
I would say it's fairly likely that at least one of the thousands of religions has at least one god that punishes you badly if you believe in a different god.
Nevertheless, the Ten Commandments state that there is no other god than Yahweh's.
Wouldn't it therefore be more rational to refrain from believing in any god at all, rather than risk choosing the wrong one from among the thousands of gods, and the one true god that I didn't choose sending me to hell or some similar place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by inclusion in the reserves.
The Swiss model seems to be somewhat similar.
X months of training (in different specialties, X months for one) and under the direction of professionals with practical experience.
If you do well, you can get a pro offer.
Such a thing would suit all components of the AČR.
It could be done in cooperation with the University of Defence.
We can talk about it like this: The cooperation between the education sector and industry is constantly being repeated, companies are hunting in schools, and there is some kind of merging, when the workforce migrates from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process goes on all the time, each of us is constantly learning something new, moving from one field to another, etc.
A similar overlap should work between the civil and military sectors.
I also see it as a way to build a kind of relationship between a citizen and the army, i.e. an institution that guarantees that Russia, Germany or a Mongolian invader will never invade here again.
I find it funny how you consider NATO as something carved in stone, we have allies and they will defend us if something goes wrong.
No, don't comfort the man.
It only takes one election in the United States to twist their budget and the whole of NATO goes down the drain.
The British are exchanging us for Russian money, the Germans are exchanging us for Russian gas and the Poles have already shown that all they need to do is show their back and take whatever they want.
The only thing that works long term as a guarantee of independence is a heavily armed army and a population that knows how to operate the military technology of the day.
And today, every teenager knows how to pilot a remote-controlled device, so what's the problem.
We don't need a border fence, that's yesterday's news, but a hulking teenager behind a remote-controlled device can handle it.
How to survive the box tsunami
You open the presents under the Christmas tree and all of a sudden you are overwhelmed with boxes and packaging at home?
This "waste" is being reused by online shops that are short of packaging materials.
Therefore, a map of shops that will accept your used boxes has been created.
And not just at Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That's why it's a shame to treat them like disposable waste.
Anyone can bring cardboard boxes, plastic or paper fillers to a participating shop (the map of the KAMsNIM.cz project contains nearly 150 of them).
This will support small businesses, reduce the amount of waste produced, and also avoid overflowing blue bins.
The shops themselves welcome the packaging, which is currently in short supply on the market, as well as the saved money, since the packaging carton has increased in price by 50 per cent over the last period.
In the eyes of environmentally minded customers, I am strengthening my brand.
One such business is TIERRA VERDE, which produces eco-friendly toiletries and cosmetics.
The boxes and packing materials are delivered to us in Popůvky near Brno by individuals who accumulate them at home, but we also hear from companies with whom we have arranged regular collections of discarded cardboard.
We use everything when packing parcels from our e-shop.
Thanks to individuals and companies, we are creating a more considerate world.
Our wish is to preserve resources and the beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
The www.KAMsNIM.cz application, however, shows not only collection points for packaging.
It serves as a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (where to take separated household waste, where to hand in expired medicines, tyres, retired electrical appliances, batteries, light sources, bulky waste, etc.).
All waste can end up in the right place, and reusable items can find their second home.
In total, the project map already includes more than 100,000 such places.
"Gradually, collection yards, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places that help to find a use for things that would otherwise needlessly become waste are being added to it," adds Miroslav Kubásek, one of the authors of the application from the Ukliďme Česko association.
It seems to me that it is wrong that today's technology is so simple and idiot-proof that children who use computers or phones to play games do not learn basic computer skills.
Recently, there has been a problem (mainly in English articles) that university students do not understand the principle of computer components.
Because things like Google Photos or Apple's Photos app, or mobile phones in general, just hide the underlying filesystem with folders and put everything on one screen in the app.
They can use the technique from their childhood, but most importantly, they should learn something.
Let's rewrite history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron unveiled France's priorities for its EU presidency - starting in January - over the weekend and it was grand.
Macron spoke for over an hour, during which he unveiled the presidency logo, called for the protection of Europeans - at work and on the street - and mentioned so many actions that they cannot be completed in half a year.
French politicians like it this way, and so do the voters.
Macron's supporters split between the right and left agree on very little, but they do agree on Europe.
And in France, there will be new elections for the head of state in April.
The election calendar also influenced the priorities.
The French leader, among other things, mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to create conditions for such work by historians.
A number of commentators were quick to criticise Macron, accusing him of pro-European propaganda and rewriting history.
In fact, it is trying to prevent the rewriting of history.
Far-right French presidential candidate Éric Zemmour is currently touring France with the thesis that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during the Second World War, was not so bad, and he is quite successful with the French.
Let's take Macron's idea of a single history textbook seriously and not look at what's happening in France.
Is it needed?
Students in European countries are often taught history as a story of us versus them and never as a story of the whole.
Spaniards, French, Czechs find out who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have an enlightened cantor, they won't learn the wider context of the event.
The film of the year is Quo Vadis, Aida?
The Czech "Mice" didn't win.
The story, which revisits the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for direction and for best actress, Jasna Duričić.
It was at the top of the viewers' rankings at this year's festival in Karlovy Vary.
The best actor in Berlin went to Anthony Hopkins for the film The Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like having a cold/being hungover A few days I had diarrhoea and didn't really feel like smoking...
It was worse than the common flu.
I don't get diarrhea with the flu.
(Only my personal experience. I don't claim that this is true for everyone)
Christmas book tips
The Christmas double issue, published on 20 December, will include the traditional literary supplement.
And along with it, cultural tips.
We are also including the books for you, our subscribers, with this digital edition, so that you have enough time to buy the books as Christmas presents.
The prose texts follow on from the previous similar collection Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another helping of observations of the world and descriptions of ordinary things with an extraordinary poetic attention to detail, depth, and atmosphere.
In his second novel, the photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of a small town and the Czech society.
A story of a return to roots that will turn out to be nothing more than a longed-for illusion.
The Bohemist and comparatist transfers the fairy tale of Little Red Riding Hood to the backdrop of a contemporary village.
Its delivery of brutality surpasses the folk versions and escalates into a horror of emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instincts is shorter than we are willing to admit
The author's penultimate novel tells a far less sentimental story about returning from emigration than we are used to hearing.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make it work.
Trains start running according to new timetable, some operators change
From Sunday, trains will be running according to a new timetable.
The biggest change is the replacement of carriers on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of Czech Railways, RegioJet starts running.
For most lines, only the departure times will be adjusted, and in some cases their routes will be adjusted slightly.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
Transport companies started selling tickets during the autumn.
České dráhy plan to operate an average of 6,783 passenger services daily in the new timetable, of which an average of 478 will be long-distance trains.
The trains will travel approximately 118 million kilometres during the new timetable.
In addition to domestic connections, the new timetable will also include routes to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company will introduce dozens of new trains along with the new timetable.
The main innovation will be the InterJet trains, which will travel on routes from Prague to Cheb.
The transport company will also run new trains in northern Moravia and western Bohemia.
The transport company will also traditionally increase the price of tickets next year, by an average of 3.2 percent.
The railways factor in inflation into their tariffs every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the introduction of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The transport company will replace České dráhy here after its success in the Ministry of Transport competition.
RegioJet will operate a total of 16 trains a day on the line, eight in each direction.
Other changes affect long-distance trains between Prague and Brno, which from Sunday will also stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín stations.
Leo Express has kept its 16 connections, two return connections to Slovakia and also weekend connections to Krakow.
According to spokesman Emil Sedlařík, the transport company also tried to keep the schedules of its long-distance trains as similar as possible despite the planned maintenance work.
The operations of Arriva trains and other carriers should continue without major changes.
Transport operators will change in some regional lines.
There will be changes for passengers, for example in the Liberec region, where instead of Czech Railways, the Trilex trains of the German company Die Länderbahn will run on the line from Mladá Boleslav via Česká Lípa to Rumburk.
In the second year, travellers will also be able to use a unified ticket for the railways.
Just like Czech Railways, their price will increase by inflation of 3.2 per cent.
I have to disagree.
Don't we learn from the other side's perspective?
We hear everywhere how much they had to struggle for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to work hard and die.
In my life, I've never heard a lesson from the perspective of the slave-owner's side or from that time, no one is defending it, just condemning it.
No one tells you in school that black people often sold other black people into slavery and that they were often the worst slavers.
No one will teach you in school that the colonisers often bought the land from the Indians. They will only tell you how brutally we, the Europeans, wiped them out, when in fact, they had been killing each other for a long time.
I also spent some time in the USA, directly in the schools, both in the northern and the southern schools.
I haven't come across anyone deliberately covering up facts, but I have heard of it happening in the past, and I think it's a problem, which I don't deny (for example, WW2 atrocities are quite a taboo in Japan).
My point was rather that history is not black and white and that we tend to look at it from today's perspective, without understanding.
History is not interested in people's feelings, it is just what it is, and I think it is a fatal mistake to condemn without looking at things from the time.
On the other hand, we should learn from it and never do it again.
By the way, while we're on the subject of the southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and the famous slave owners are quite popular there, on the other hand, they also had some good successes and it seemed absurd to me to reject them.
In addition, the North was not much better, as many people idealise it today.
And a lot of people also forget that not everyone in the South were slave owners and a lot of things also went against them.
I wouldn't compare this to the Russians, they deliberately leave out some facts, lie and manipulate, moreover, our point of view doesn't exist for them (there was a video on YT from the television, where they turned off someone who started talking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What I found funny about US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealisation of communism, something their country has never experienced.
Overall, it seemed to me that at some universities it was terrible, those students were quite radicalised and those schools often supported them.
And when I imagine that these people will be much older one day, I feel a little sick from the thought that this could be the voice of the majority, because it is among the young and even in the ruling elite.
It seems to me that, for example, feminism has already achieved what it had to and it is no longer about the same things, it has become radicalized.
Currently, feminists are those who have nothing to do with him and ignore the basic biological fact, as well as other groups like LGBT, which leads to radicalization on both sides, often leading to resistance even to quite reasonable things.
Furthermore, the more radical someone is, the more likely they are to be heard.
That said, at the end of the day, I haven't met anyone who has condemned me for colonialism or slavery.
I've encountered more bad geography, but that was mutual :D
Not because I don't like it here, but because I think it is completely pointless.
Should I be proud of something I couldn't do on my own?
Moreover, I consider the concept of nationality as a whole to be unnecessary in terms of personal identity.
If I have anything in common with people, it's interests, views of the world and shared experiences, not where we were born.
I am not a believer, but from what I know, I can tell you this: We have two Greek-Catholic parishes here, one is Ukrainian and the other is Slovak.
That Slovak priest is a really nice guy, his sermons are more about theology than politics, but then he always comes up with some nonsense about the coronavirus, that everyone should be ashamed.
Then there is the Czech-Slovak Hussite Church, of course.
Officially, they are Protestants, but in reality, they were born out of Catholic modernism, and are effectively Catholics without a pope.
I know a lot of people who are Catholic but go to services at the Hussites because it's theologically very similar, but the members tend to be more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická Street.
Otherwise, St Michael's Church on Dominican Square belongs to the Dominicans and they even hold a mass in Latin every Sunday at 3 pm, as it was done before Vatican II.
The flame from Bethlehem is in the Czech Republic, scouts took it over from Austria
Břeclav – The flame lit in Bethlehem, where according to Christian tradition Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
However, due to the coronavirus pandemic, the scouts did not travel to Vienna for him this time. In the morning, they received him from their Austrian colleagues at the Reintal - Břeclav border crossing.
Last year, they also took it at the border.
The Bethlehem Light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we participate in every year with the group, and I really look forward to it.
It is an honour for me that I have been chosen, said the scout Amálie Budíková to the present journalists.
While last year the handover took place at the Mikulov-Drasenhofen border crossing, directly on the border bridge, this year it took place at the Reintal-Břeclav border crossing on the car park.
However, the scouts usually travel to Vienna by train.
Nothing changes in the delivery of the flame across the Czech Republic.
The scouts set off with the Bethlehem light by train to Brno, where they will hand it over to the diocesan bishop, Vojtěch Cikrle.
On Saturday, 18 December, scout couriers will take care of the subsequent distribution of the light. They will travel by selected express trains and passenger trains.
The light will be taken over by local scouts and volunteers, who will then spread the flame across the Czech Republic to places where the tracks do not lead.
This year too, the scouts must follow the current measures against the spread of the coronavirus.
It's going the same way as last year.
We recommend both the delivery teams and organisers of local events to, of course, wear masks, try to keep a safe distance, be as few as possible, not to sing to each other, just to behave so that it is as safe as possible, described the spokesperson of the Bethlehem Light event, Zuzana Hrbková.
The tradition of the Bethlehem light traveling through Europe was born in 1986 in Austria.
The aim is to spread the idea of peace, friendship and peace along with the flame.
For believers, the Bethlehem light is a symbol of hope, a light that overcomes the darkness.
In the Czech Republic, the Boy Scouts and Girl Scouts have been involved in its dissemination for more than 30 years.
Hundreds of volunteers are involved in the event, and the flame is also a symbol of selflessness and human solidarity.
All the news, including a list of places where people can come for the flame, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I do not have an economic education, so I do not know the basics of economics which confirm that subsidies are the cancer of the economy, but I do not think that the subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
Infrastructure development, ecology (e.g. water retention), healthcare and education will make good use of the money. I just don't understand why the money is given to agriculture, industry and businesses in general.
As mentioned, this produces a useless product and disrupts the free market and the "natural life of the company".
I work in a factory where there are a million signs in the corridors saying "project xy financed/co-financed by project xy" and such a company is just artificially kept alive.
This is not supporting a company which employs x people, this is holding back development when this company is just about holding on and taking work/employees away from companies which could grow and be more productive after its demise.
Absolutely agree, it's awful.
Even a person who was born in the internet age can sometimes fall into some trick or trap - especially advertising.
I think that online advertising doesn't work on me, but then I always end up being influenced by it anyway - it's just so sophisticated that you can't avoid it.
For this reason, I support the radical voices in the European Parliament who currently want to impose a total ban on programmatic (= targeted) advertising...
It's all rubbish, according to the classic - I'd ban the internet.
I have a feeling that this virus has its roots in (but mostly in point 1):
1. "I will not believe in something that the majority believes in and makes sense, I am not a sheep after all, but I will rather believe in something that is less likely to be true, it does not make much sense, but it is important that I have my own original opinion that I will claim is critical thinking"
2. "I won't believe everything the media says"
3. "I don't trust politicians."
TV has fallen out of love with the Christmas movie, with two hundred premiering this year
Los Angeles - Movie theaters, TV channels and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries are bucking the trend of Christmas films and are premiering more than 200 this year.
The operator of the IMDb film database did the count.
The genre of Christmas family and romantic films has been scoring with the audience in recent years and has significantly increased viewership, so more and more of these films are being made.
Four times as many Christmas films were made this year than in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database only includes those films that have the word Christmas in their title, so there are actually a lot more Christmas films out there.
Films that people traditionally associate with Christmas have always been there.
In the Czech Republic, this period is mainly associated with fairy tales; worldwide, the films Home Alone, Love Actually and the classic Christmas story It's a Wonderful Life from 1946 are popular.
However, the real boom in Christmas movies started in 2009, when the American cable television channel Hallmark came up with a special film series, the BBC website recalled.
Her Advent project called Countdown to Christmas then included four films and was very successful.
This year, the channel started to tune in its viewers for Christmas on 22 October and will show a total of 42 Christmas films.
Competitor network Lifetime has 35 new Christmas-themed films on its schedule this year, and popular streaming platforms like Netflix are also contributing to the total.
"In this magical time of year, the story doesn't matter as much as the fact that there's a lot of Christmas trees in the background and it's snowing," Brandon Gray, author of the book "I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies," said with a laugh.
"For the audience, it's a form of escape and a way to at least for two hours feel a little bit of calm in the midst of all of the holiday craziness and the craziness of the world we've been living in for the last few years," Gray added.
According to him, for example, the Hallmark channel uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform, but successful.
You have two people falling in love, but then there's a misunderstanding about half an hour before the end, which is successfully resolved and the two people kiss.
That's just the way it is, and as long as all the films look the same and have the same atmosphere, people will watch one after the other, adds Gray.
Mazepin tested positive for covid-19 and will not take part in the final F1 race.
Only 19 drivers will take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin has tested positive for Covid-19 and will miss the final race of the season.
The Haas team will only send one formula to the track.
In the last race of the season, he was aiming for a better finish than the 20th place he qualified for.
Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team, however, will not take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He tested positive for COVID-19.
Only 19 cars will appear on the starting grid, with Mick Schumacher, Mazepin's team-mate, starting from the back of the grid, and Max Verstappen starting from the front, as he battles Lewis Hamilton for the title.
According to Haas, Mazepin is doing well and does not show any symptoms.
Nikita is physically well because he was asymptomatic.
He is now in isolation and will follow the advice of the relevant public health authorities, with safety being the ultimate priority for all involved," his representatives said on formula1.com.
Haas will not send a reserve driver to the race, nor can they.
The reserve driver would have to qualify or drive in another part of the weekend.
The first driver is not affected by covid-19.
At the start of this season, Kimi Räikkönen had COVID-19, while last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton tested positive.
You can also be locked up for this.
And everyone will be robbed, the boss said.
According to the law, COVID-19 is on the list of infectious diseases.
That is, in the same group as HIV, the plague, yellow fever, or typhus.
§ 152 Dissemination of a Contagious Human Disease
(1) Any person who knowingly causes or increases the risk of the introduction or spread of an infectious disease in humans shall be punished by imprisonment for six months to three years, a ban on activities or the forfeiture of a thing.
(2) The offender shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of two to eight years.
c) commits a breach of an important duty arising from his employment, profession, position or function or imposed on him by law, or
d) causing serious bodily injury.
(3) The offender shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of three to ten years, if, by the act provided for in paragraph 1, he has caused serious bodily harm to at least two persons or death.
(4) A sentence of imprisonment for a term of five to twelve years will be imposed on the perpetrator if he has caused the death of at least two persons by the act referred to in paragraph 1.
Quiz: Why women often run failing companies and what your boss must never ask you
The gender pay gap between men and women, i.e. the so-called gender pay gap, has been one of the highest in the EU in the Czech Republic for a long time.
Which country has the biggest differences?
And in which age category and industry do women earn the least compared to men?
Test yourself on how much you know about the gender pay gap.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: the price tag of the most expensive sweater will astonish you!
It's a bit like a portable jeweller's shop, and the creator has put six months of work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but little experience. Sweaters were never really worn at home," admits Liban, who spent 3,000 hours over the course of six months working on his creation.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the 2,000 decorative crystals were supplied by Swarowski.
The silver stars were then adorned with 150 diamonds.
"The base is wool and cotton, but the silk adds softness to the sweater," the creator praises his work, which he does not recommend to wash.
And it has another twist.
"I'm completely broke, I have to sell the sweater as soon as possible," confesses Liban.
If he succeeds, he will set a world record.
The previous most expensive sweater, sold five years ago, cost "only" 720,000 Czech crowns.
If the Ministry of Health is detached from reality, it doesn't matter too much - it will have the faulty circuit repaired and replaced with a new one.
The fact is that Facebook's departure from Europe would help its non-Russian part (which is under the influence of bad luck).
I think it would clean up the social climate quite a bit.
The channels of 'Soviet brotherly aid' to some of our political parties and leaders would also become clearer.
Then, the people who vote for them would also have a clear idea about whose interests they are actually serving.
It's a shame they don't own TikTok as well.
A lot of young people would suddenly discover with great surprise that the sun was shining outside...
Trump was directly calling for the abuse of suspects, and he is now reaping what he has sown.
About the situation in the USA with the leading African-American reporter.
New cases of police violence are emerging in the United States, this time during the nationwide protests.
Demonstrations that erupted after an African American, George Floyd, was killed by a police officer during an arrest have opened up a debate about systemic racism, police work and cases of brutality against minorities in the United States.
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with one of the leading African-American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But where would the funding come from?
The union is flooding us with money in the form of subsidies.
If it stops doing that, we stop having that money.
I really don't see how the fact that the EU will stop giving us money will cause us to use that money for something else...
You can argue that the money from those grants could be spent better, but that is a completely different discussion.
Is it even possible for a pub not to pay taxes?
Is it even possible for a pub to reduce taxes?
After all, if a piece of meat passes veterinary control, it must be registered somewhere and it can't just be lost, can it?
Similarly, Prazdroj and Jelínek probably don't produce special alcoholic beverages for the black market.
However, I am often not given a receipt or they take it away and throw it away.
The government has approved the deployment of up to 150 troops to help Poland.
Surveyors, geologists and drone pilots could be deployed as early as Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They will help their Polish colleagues protect the border with Belarus and build the planned fence.
Poland has officially appealed for help from NATO countries in connection with the months-long actions of the Belarusian regime, which invites citizens of Middle Eastern countries to its territory with a false promise of an easy crossing of the EU border.
British and Estonian troops are already active on Polish territory.
Is the Omicron mutation spreading in South Moravia?
Public Health is investigating another case of a child from Adamov.
"We currently have another suspected case of this variant in another child from Adam's, in the prep class.
There is no evidence of direct contact with previous cases from the Adamov elementary school," said Ciupek.
Six cases appeared in the region last week.
"We are still waiting for official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - it is being carried out by the National Influenza and Non-Influenza Virus Reference Laboratory of the State Health Institute in Prague," said the director.
She added that it concerns two nurses from one department of the Faculty Hospital in Brno and two children of one of them, as well as two eleven-year-old pupils of the Adamov Elementary School.
There is no connection between the cases in Brno and Adamov.
According to the director, three of them have mild symptoms and four of them are asymptomatic.
No one with suspected Omicron has travelled abroad
None of those mentioned had travelled abroad, nor had anyone in their families, and there was no contact with anyone who had been abroad.
None of the people mentioned have any connection to the water polo championship, said Ciupek.
Chief hygienist Pavla Svrčinová has previously stated that an international water polo tournament held in Brno a few weeks ago is being investigated.
Players from South Africa and one Belgian player became ill after returning.
California will limit gun sales.
They want to follow Texas' lead in banning abortions.
California Gov. Gavin Newsom on Saturday announced a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of some guns in the nation's most populous state through a legal mechanism used by Texas in its controversial abortion law that bans the procedure once a fetal heartbeat is detected.
People would then have the right to sue anyone in California who manufactures or sells assault weapons and homemade guns.
Newsom's announcement came in response to a ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court on Friday that left in place a Texas law that bans abortions after about six weeks of pregnancy, despite being at odds with a nearly 50-year-old precedent that established a nationwide right to abortion until about the 24th week of pregnancy.
The court was not, however, ruling on the constitutionality of the whole law, but on a technical issue arising from the innovative construction of the measure.
Enforcement of the ban was turned over to the public in this case, making it impossible for Texas Republicans to challenge it in court.
"I am outraged by yesterday's (Friday) decision by the U.S. Supreme Court to uphold Texas' ban on most abortions and largely endorse Texas' scheme to shield its law," the California governor said.
"If states can now block the review of their laws by federal courts, then California will use that authority to protect human lives," Newsom continued.
He allegedly instructed his subordinates to work with the state parliament and the minister of justice on a measure that would allow public representatives to enforce a ban on assault rifles and so-called ghost guns.
So-called "ghost guns" are homemade guns that don't have serial numbers and can be used to evade regulations.
Newsom wants "private citizens" to have the right to sue for at least $10,000 (220,000 CZK) in damages and legal fees from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault rifles, "ghost gun" parts or kits to make them in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these deadly weapons off our streets is to create a threat of private lawsuits, then that's exactly what we should do," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the manufacture and sale of some military-style weapons for decades, but a federal judge in June blocked the ban as unconstitutional.
If the state were to actually reinstate the ban using the Texas model, it would confirm the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissenting opinion to Friday's majority ruling warned against expanding the legal mechanism to other U.S. states.
The Supreme Court, however, did not grant Texas's ban on abortion total immunity from judicial review, allowing abortion clinics to continue their lawsuits against certain officials in the southern U.S. state.
Every emergency vaccination has a public trial phase, where the vaccination schedule is gradually worked out, and the vaccines themselves are also improved, based on the results.
For example, studies on the effects of 4 doses are already rolling in from Israel.
And according to these studies, in most patients there is a five-fold increase in antibodies, which already has the long-term effect you mentioned.
Like any other vaccine, it will have its own vaccination schedule, but it's too early for that.
Another fact is that a new vaccine based on an inactivated virus will soon be on the market. According to the manufacturer's specifications, it promises to be up to 10 times more effective.
Leave the amount of material as it is.
But re-evaluating what is being taught.
Since the days of Maria Theresa, our civilisation and technology have moved on a bit, and learning phone directories and copying textbooks into notebooks no longer makes much sense and is a waste of time.
It would be really brutal to cut back on these things.
On the other hand, how many people leave basic school with some basic financial literacy?
And what else will it need to survive?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is an online service here in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
At home, we have a Netbox and I pay for the Telly sports package for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, this does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatens to block EU budget payments
According to Ziobro, the European Commission would be acting unlawfully if it used its new powers to withhold payments to Poland due to the rule-of-law dispute.
The Commission has already delayed approval of Poland's plan to tap 36 billion euros from the EU's recovery fund for economies hit by the COVID-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to go further and use a mechanism to withdraw EU funds from countries that violate the rule of law.
"Poland should respond to this blackmail by the EU with a veto in all matters requiring unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarity Poland party, without whose votes the current government would lose its narrow majority in the Sejm.
"Poland should also consider its obligations in the EU energy and climate policy, which lead to a sharp rise in energy prices," added Ziobro.
If the dispute continues, I will ask Poland to stop its contributions to the EU.
It would be justified given the fact that the EU is unlawfully denying us funds from the common budget, to which we also contribute, added the Polish minister.
His party has a more radical approach to the EU than the ruling Law and Justice party.
According to the European Commission, changes to the Polish justice system during Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
According to Ziobro, Brussels is setting "impossible conditions, because its goal is not the rule of law, but a change of government in Poland."
Warsaw is facing "a political dictatorship carried out by blackmail and an attempt to undermine the democratic decision of several million Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said that Poland should be a member of an EU that is based on the partnership of sovereign states, and not on the rule of the strongest and the Brussels bureaucracy, which is not subject to democratic control.
He said his party would never agree to any concessions to Brussels that would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to the status of Poland as a colony," he said.
But to get to grips with it... In our Lidl, they have one type of cheese in four different places.
I didn't look at anything else, I met one yoghurt more than once, I just needed some cheese, parmesan, after ten minutes in the dairy aisle I gave up and asked.
They had it, it's true, in that narrow aisle there were all the selected, less common and special cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If I can avoid it, I don't even set foot in a supermarket, action or no action, the golden shop on the square, they don't have such a wide selection there, but they usually have everything I need and it's all in some kind of order, so I'm done in ten minutes.
I went to Lidl to buy a holiday.
And I don't care anymore.
I've been watching for two years as data is treated like manure here, and most of the anti-vaxxers are just a little bit more off-base than most of the pro-vaxxers.
A rational discussion is taking place on a professional level, but only extreme opinions are making it into the public sphere.
It's a constant back-and-forth.
Binary thinking: vaccination will save us, vaccination is useless.
Ban everything, allow everything.
Pie charts instead of robust analysis.
Comparing apples to oranges.
This state does it this way, and we do it this way.
But that the method of data collection is different in those two states is no one's concern.
Phew, I feel better now.
I'm sorry for the rant, and I wish you all a nice day.
As a child, I was punished with a wooden spoon.
It was never because of grades, it was just that I repeatedly refused to listen and misbehaved (reading instead of going to bed, fighting with my brother, etc).
At the same time, I have never been punished without a warning. My mother would always first threaten that if I did it again, I would get a slap (sometimes even after "catching" the spoon a second time, she would just bring it and place it so that I could see it).
It wasn't until I repeatedly refused to listen that I received a couple of slaps to the backside (through clothing).
Personally, I believe that physical punishment (in a reasonable manner and amount) is beneficial, as a child responds to it much more than words.
I think the part with the warning is important, because it gives the child a choice whether to disobey and get the punishment, or to improve and not get the punishment.
I usually just needed a warning to start listening.
Defending the system
When the prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional judge Vojtěch Cepl answered a journalist's question in 1999 on what the Czech constitution means to him - whether it is a sacred document to which one swears an oath and which is taught at school from an early age, or, on the contrary, an agreement that can be changed if necessary - he definitely favoured the first option.
We once agreed in the constitution on the democratic rules of our lives, which at the same time define who we are as a state and its citizens, and we should be more careful with changes.
And imagine this: some nations actually like their rules.
Just like Czechs love dumplings with pork and sauerkraut, Vojtěch Cepl remarked at the time.
However, in recent times, it has become more common for lawyers to argue that the Czech Constitution needs to be changed.
For years, it has been tested by situations that its creators (including Vojtěch Cepl) could not predict, such as the behaviour of the directly elected president.
One thing Cepl was right about, though.
Everything we know about such documents suggests that political interventions in their text must be well thought out.
The institution must be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to dealing with most of the crises that societies have faced throughout history.
The constitution, among other things, is a set of rules of government that set limits on what politicians can do.
We fear that power will be abused against minorities or individuals, so we tie the hands of politicians with bans.
At the same time, the constitutional texts also allow politicians to exercise their power.
Covid-19 doesn't discriminate; a six-month-old baby is fighting for its life at the Brno University Hospital
Although it is known that the coronavirus is usually milder for children, there are also severe cases, which the hospital has mainly been dealing with in recent times.
"We know that children are less at risk and less affected than adults, with 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said Petr Dominik, head of the Department of Paediatric Anesthesiology and Resuscitation at the University Hospital Brno and the Medical Faculty of Masaryk University to Novinky.
The course is much easier, milder, often without symptoms.
There are, however, child patients who are severely ill with the coronavirus, which we can see in particular in recent times," added Dominik.
According to the doctor, there are dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It is set in a children's infectious disease clinic.
Children who are very seriously ill with coronavirus have only recently been admitted to PICU.
According to the doctor, children with post-Covid syndromes have been admitted to the department continuously throughout the year.
"Now we're seeing an increase in kids with acute COVID pneumonia, that's the inflammation of the lungs that requires admission to the intensive care unit," he said, adding that the illness affects not just adults but also adolescents and infants as young as a few months old.
There are also children in critical condition due to COVID-19 in hospitals.
"Currently, we have a child of several months and an adolescent in our care," said the chief physician.
However, she is happy that, so far, there have been no child deaths in the children's hospital at the Brno University Hospital due to the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children aged between 0 and 14 died in the Czech Republic on 6 December.
According to Dominik, in a children's hospital - not just in the COVID-19 ward - a psychologist is an integral part of the team.
At the same time, he points out that, just like in adults, vaccination reduces the severity of the disease and at the same time reduces the incidence of the post-Covid syndrome in children.
"That's why we recommend the vaccination for children as well," added the doctor.
In the rest zone, you can only walk on marked paths.
But those quiet zones aren't that large.
They are visible on the tourist map on mapy.cz.
In general, you can walk anywhere in national parks outside the quiet zone (but don't climb over the fence into the enclosure).
Skiing/biking in the forest off-piste is not allowed anywhere unless you have an exception (but of course this is not really enforced outside of national parks).
How does a conductor train?
The music is playing in my head, smiles Josef Kurfiřt.
He was weaned on the Liberec Opera and originally played the French horn.
As a singer, he can sing almost any repertoire, and as a conductor, he is not only active in the Liberec F. Šaldy Theatre, but also, for example, in Pilsen, in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
He works with the Hradec Philharmonic, the film orchestra or the Podkrkonoší Symphony Orchestra.
China is building an image of having contained the outbreak and that an authoritarian regime is better at dealing with a crisis
Sinologist Jirouš: China is building the impression that it has the epidemic under control and that the authoritarian regime is coping with the crisis better.
China has launched a healthcare and political offensive.
A few months ago, Beijing was on the defensive for failing to contain an outbreak that morphed into a global pandemic.
The country is now reporting zero new infections.
States including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment and Chinese doctors are helping in the fight against the coronavirus in many places, including in the worst-affected Italy.
How do you see Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support, or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
A friend meets a friend and says: do you want an elephant?
I have it and it's great.
The wife is happy because it mows the lawn, washes the car, and the children can play with it.
It's just great.
If you want to buy an elephant for 5000, I can sell you one.
Friend: Sure, I'll do it, it'll be great...
Some time later, they meet again, and the one who bought it complains: you bastards, what did you sell the elephant for????
The lawn is trampled, there are giant turds everywhere, the car is broken, the children are scared and the wife wants a divorce.
The person who sold it says: You don't talk about an elephant like that, you can't sell an elephant like that...
The world is dominated by the great powers.
Despite the equality of sovereign states, it is the great powers that determine the course of international events.
Europe can only become a superpower if it works on its integration.
It currently functions at the economic and political levels (on selected issues), but military integration is still lacking.
Personally, I think that Europe is heading towards federalisation.
It won't be in 10, 15 or 20 years.
But in the middle of the century, the mood will be different and it will work out.
It also occurred to me, and it's quite possible.
I'm not an expert on Czech, so I might be pedantic.
I'm just going off of the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units at the same level.
I'll borrow an example from another comment "Spanish oranges and mandarins" where it's clear that they're both from Spain, but in "Spanish fruit and mandarins" it's not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
Moreover, I base this on the fact that the sentence states "all American forces", which includes their weapons, and I know that American complexes are operated only by Americans.
In other words, I expect it to be included in the broad definition, and there is no need to further specify it for American forces.
But again, just being a pedant :D
Whether it's true or not, it's a ridiculous demand
A 5-magnitude earthquake was recorded in Tokyo.
A 5.0-magnitude earthquake struck Japan's capital Tokyo and surrounding areas on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings shook in the capital, but there were no immediate reports of damage.
No tsunami warning was issued, Reuters reported.
British woman Vicki Holland tortured Milly the capuchin monkey
Shocking footage shows the moment a terrified monkey cowered in a toilet bowl before its heartless owner flushed it away and laughed.
Holland also fed the monkey hot dogs, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of her actual nutritional needs.
Gwent Magistrates' Court has now banned her from keeping animals for life, The Sun reports.
The primate rehabilitation experts looking after Milly after her ordeal have said they have never seen a monkey so terrified.
Milly spent almost two years in rehabilitation with staff at Monkey World in Dorset and is now happily playing with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The mother-of-four admitted two charges of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was given a 12-week prison sentence, suspended for 12 months, at Gwent Magistrates' Court.
Holland was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, received a lifetime ban from keeping animals, and must pay court costs of approximately 12,000 Czech crowns.
Steph Sawyer, head of the Small Monkeys team that rehabilitated the abused animal, said: "Milly is doing well but her rehabilitation will continue."
It took Milly a while to get used to people again.
She crouched and hid from anyone she encountered and any loud noise or sudden movement caused her to scream.
The monkey refused to eat for a long time.
Even now that she's settled and happy with her mate, the sight of new people can still send her into a panic.
The mental scars from the abuse will stay with her forever, says Sawyer.
Milly's abuse came to light after police in Gwent discovered the horrifying footage on her phone following a drugs raid at her home.
In the footage, Milly can be heard swearing.
In another video, Ms. Holland is heard offering the monkey cocaine and saying, "You want some coke?"
So, lick my fingers.
In May she and her partner Russell Cox (43) admitted possession of cocaine with intent to supply.
Her home was found to contain cocaine worth £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns) hidden in Kinder eggs.
Cox was jailed for 30 months and Holland received a 20-month suspended sentence.
And what wonderful concepts will you learn from this prehistoric three times in a row, when you courageously jump over the entire 20th century?
Do you get the same things in first year as you do in sixth form?
And the whole thing kills the idea of bifolding, where no one, with the exception of a few, is interested in whether you can do it or understand it.
The main thing is to write a test on 1 and then nobody cares.
Go out on the street and ask random people if they can solve the character of the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone goes through it, and the vast majority don't even flinch and will tell you they don't care.
So why are they learning it?
I'm a big fan of general knowledge and the fact is that people don't want it and don't need it.
And at that point it's futile and you'll never get it into them.
You learn it in part for all the people who will need it.
But as for the remark that you don't need any of this while standing at the machine, I meant it very seriously... ...because you really don't need it.
Moreover, we're slowly approaching the time when not knowing is a sign of punk.
(Which is probably due to our communist past and our anger towards intellectuals and elites) But the price of having barbarians standing by those machines is just too high.
If only the journalists knew how to count, the coronavirus would probably never have reached these dimensions.
Wedding at first sight: The war between Kadri and Andrey continues!
Which is the main reason why Switzerland can't leave right away," Andrea answered on Instagram in Stories to all-encompassing questions from curious fans about why she was so disappointed with Kadri that she decided to end all contact and even block him on social media.
From the beginning of the experiment, Kadri and Andrea have been at each other's throats.
The main problem was the fact that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea should move there, at least until he moved back to the Czech Republic for good.
However, she resolutely refused.
And as it can be seen, their relationship didn't end in love, but rather turned into mutual disrespect and even hatred.
It was your planned attack!" Kadri retorted in response to Andrei's accusations of lies, gambling and debts.
Kadri's alleged honesty did not sit well with his ex-wife or his younger sister Linda.
She decided to publicly stand up for her brother.
Normally I don't talk about these things, and in my family, we never really talked about these things.
I certainly don't want to evoke any sympathy.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and besmirch the name of someone I love so much, I just can't take it!
I'm sorry that I have to do this in this way, but I would like to publicly thank my brother Kadir for making a character of himself and helping our family when we needed it most, despite his young age.
I am more disappointed when I have to read such false information, which is probably taken out of context.
I wish everyone knew Kadri the way we do, our close friends and family said in a statement in response to Andrey's words.
I'm really grateful to him for everything!
Of course people are going to believe what they read, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him more than anything and we know the truth and we know what really happened, she said vaguely.
A drunk thief climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You won't believe why.
Chao began his robbery spree in a residential neighborhood parking lot, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to information available, he ultimately stole less than 330 crowns from one vehicle.
He couldn't think of anything better to do than to climb up to the 5th floor and enter the apartment through the open window.
There, he stole two bananas.
Footage from a security camera then shows him walking down the street away from the scene of the crime, while eating a banana.
When the apartment's owner woke up in the morning, he realized that the bananas were not where they were and called the police.
She was then detained by Cchaa.
The man admitted that he drank some alcohol on the day in question.
Since he needed money, he decided to rob while drunk.
The whole thing is currently under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the 5th floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and its effectiveness is linked to the state of pandemic preparedness.
When that is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law does limit the scope of business
Is that not enough of a reason for you?
The right to assemble will be restricted, but not abolished.
More than 60 percent of voters took part in Saturday's elections to the councils of four municipalities
On Saturday, people elected new councillors in the municipalities of Komňa in the Uherské Hradiště district, Lužice in the Most district, Nová Ves in the Liberec district, and in Rovná in the Pelhřimov district.
The number of councillors in these municipalities has fallen below the number required by law, or the elected councils have collapsed.
A total of 99 candidates competed for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected councillors is 46.7 years.
The oldest of them is 69 years old, the youngest is 33 years old.
Processing the results of Saturday's elections symbolically closes a rather demanding, but successful year for us.
A total of four new or repeated elections to municipal councils and, above all, the very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies, were held there, said Deputy Chairperson of the Czech Statistical Office Eva Krumpová.
She reminded that due to the COVID-19 epidemic, the elections were more demanding in terms of equipment and human resources.
In Komňa near Uherské Hradiště, the Association of Independent Candidates won the Saturday elections, gaining 27.76% of the vote and two seats in the seven-member council.
The STAN candidate received 24.84% of the votes, which also means winning two seats.
Občané pro Komňu also won two seats on the council, receiving 18.52 percent of the vote.
The former mayor of the village, Jana Křižková, who is a member of the Soukromníci, also got back into the council.
The Komňans - independent candidates - won one seat on the council.
75.48 percent of eligible voters went to the polls.
The Pro Rovnou association won in the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov.
It received 50.50% of the votes, which means four mandates out of seven.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 were also elected to the municipal council.
Voter turnout was 93.62 percent.
The repeated elections in Lužice on Mostecko were again won by the Association of Lužice and Svinčice, led by Mayor Jindřich John.
It received 56.73 percent of the vote and, as in 2018, has four seats in the seven-member council.
The second place went to the Citizens for the City party, which received 43.27 percent of the vote, so it will have three representatives in the council.
76.7 percent of voters went to the ballot boxes.
Independent candidates for Hope for Nová Ves won the elections in Nová Ves in the Liberec Region before the ANO movement.
The association of independent candidates received 59.88 percent of the vote and won four of the seven seats in the municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the vote and strengthened its position compared to the regular elections in 2018, gained one more mandate and now has three.
Voter turnout was 42.9 per cent.
On Monday, the State Election Commission will discuss the election results.
They will then be published in the Collection of Laws.
What do you think would be the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think you know all of this stuff that people are writing to you about.
You're just playing the fool to have someone to "argue" with.
If not, it's sad.
I'm not saying that Christians are degenerates, or anything like that.
In fact, I like a lot of church buildings from an aesthetic point of view (which, after all, was the point, to make them look good).
And I don't care who believes in what.
On the other hand, I don't like how much power the church had in the Middle Ages, how much money it amassed, the suppression of science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars she has caused, e.g. the Thirty Years' War
TL;DR: Believe in the Spaghetti Monster if you like, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell head-first from a height of twelve meters.
He survived the crash into the concrete.
An incredible fall was survived by a man in Ostrava on Sunday night, who was helped by rescuers from the Moravian-Silesian Ambulance Service.
The regional emergency centre received an emergency call an hour after midnight on Saturday, with initial information about a man falling from a height.
Two ambulance crews - medical and paramedic - were immediately sent to the scene.
Upon arrival at the scene, paramedics discovered that the 27-year-old man had fallen from a height of around 12 metres and landed on his head on the concrete!
The coal caught fire in Vítkovice.
But not as it should have been, and the firefighters went into action.
When emergency services arrived the man was unconscious, with multiple injuries and in a life-threatening condition.
The attending physician intubated his respiratory tract, provided artificial lung ventilation, and after further measures as part of pre-hospital emergency care, the ambulance transported him to further care at the Ostrava trauma centre, informed the spokesperson for the Moravian-Silesian Ambulance Service, Lukáš Humpl.
I'm more worried about the inadequate reactions of the public and authorities than I am about the coronavirus
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic is a challenge for politicians and officials, but doctors and medical staff are at the forefront of the fight against the disease.
How serious is the situation from their perspective?
We are asking military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek Research: Tomáš Roček, sound engineer: David Kaiser, music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes fell after seven years, Oliveira defended the belt
The MMA experienced a great gala evening full of interesting results.
Things were happening at UFC 269.
The outsider Julianna Peña was able to beat the legendary fighter Amanda Nunes, who had not been defeated for seven years.
In the lightweight division, Charles Oliveira made short work of Dustin Poirier to retain his title.
There was also victory for Kai Kara-France, who quickly swept aside Cody Garbrandt with a TKO in the first round.
Sean O'Malley also beat his opponent.
A surprise that no one expected.
This was brought about by the women's bantamweight bout between the famous Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña.
The American entered the mutual fight as a kind of "dwarf", because Nunes had not lost for seven years and was sharpening her teeth for another triumph.
The start of the duel was also in line with the paper predictions.
Nunes started the fight very actively and even landed a push kick on her opponent, which sent her to the ground.
However, Pena was not to be pushed into making another mistake, and she herself unsuccessfully tried to attack with a wrist lock.
The second round was gripping and very tense for MMA fans.
The two rivals traded a number of excellent punches and hard hooks.
Peña then took Nunes to the ground, where she began to choke her.
She had to give up her efforts and fend off the attack.
The American caused a huge shock when she became the new champion.
The main event was the lightweight title bout between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier.
At first, Poirier did better, but the cards started to turn against him.
In the second round, Oliveira tried to be more active and tried to submit his opponent with an armbar.
He didn't do very well with it, but he then built up a lot of pressure, got his opponent on his back and peppered him with a series of blows.
That is why he won the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to tap out.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next bout, Sean O'Malley scored a resounding victory, landing a hard right hand on Raulian Paiva in the first round.
He then knocked him out with a series of well-aimed punches and recorded his 15th victory.
Kara-France then took care of Cody Garbrandt.
In the spring, Nunes celebrated another triumph with her little daughter, now, after seven years, she has lost.
That hip or that hip?
At first glance, it doesn't seem complicated.
Most nouns in Czech express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether they are masculine, feminine or neuter.
Then there is also a fairly large group of nouns for which the gender is not fixed.
Such substantive nouns oscillate between two genders.
When inflected, they acquire dual endings, and in some cases remain in the uninflected form.
For example, the words "svízel" and "kyčel" are both masculine and feminine, in the first one they are declined according to the pattern "stroj", in the second one according to the pattern "píseň".
Another group of nouns have different forms in the first singular case, for example: "řádek/řádka", "kedluben/kedlubna" or "brambor/brambora" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are correct, have the same meaning, and are therefore freely interchangeable.
Some words can vary regionally, for example "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, in this case the Moravian variant is non-standard, as is the case with other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih", etc.
Some words that have entered the Czech language from other languages were originally uninflected, but have gradually adopted Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image", which is of both masculine and feminine gender, or the word "buffet", which remains in the middle gender without declension, but in masculine it has endings according to the model of "castle".
Turkey opened the path for migrants to Europe.
What's the situation like at the Greek border?
Tensions are running high on the Greek-Turkish border as more migrants try to make their way into Europe.
Thousands of people have been heading for the southern edge of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped holding them back.
European politicians promise Greece support, the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What actually motivates refugees to make this uncertain journey?
And what is the situation like on the spot?
We haven't seen blue sky for three months and we've been choking, says Sydney journalist
The devastating fires, which have been plaguing Australia for four months, have killed almost three dozen people and hundreds of millions of animals, and have destroyed millions of acres of land.
How are the local authorities and the people themselves coping with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to avoid the drastic impact, critics say?
And what will the country have to prepare for in terms of climate change in the future?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with Sydney-based journalist Ika Detrichová.
False allegations are always and have always been relatively rare.
That's why everyone is always written about everywhere.
It's uncomfortable for people to talk about the extent of sexual violence in our society and how widespread it is, so they try to pretend it doesn't exist.
I don't personally know anyone who's been falsely accused.
I know a lot of people who have been raped, and I have seen how the people around them, and even the police, often treat them.
Victims should always be believed.
A trend has emerged of victims finally opening up about their traumas.
But too many people keep it to themselves.
Yes, there are those who make false accusations.
It's disgusting and spitting in the face of all sexual assault victims, but spreading the idea that "a lot of accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" only helps sexual predators.
Scattered homes flood the Czech Republic, families have no money to finish them
The cost of building materials has risen by more than 30 per cent in recent weeks and months.
A number of people have found themselves in a difficult situation because of it.
It does not have the means to complete the family houses that have already been laid out and the banks are refusing to increase the mortgage loans.
In addition to the cost of materials, the cost of construction work is also increasing.
People therefore do not have enough money to complete the family homes that have already been set up.
In many cases, banks are refusing to increase mortgage loans, which creates an extremely unpleasant situation.
At best, people move into prefabricated and unpermitted homes.
In the worst case, the houses are uninhabitable and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay off their mortgages and also pay rent," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We build two to three family homes a year, and in fifty percent of cases this has happened to us.
For us, as a construction company, it is difficult in that we have to abide by some things contractually, even though the materials have become more expensive.
So we're doing it for free," said construction company owner Zdeněk Slivoň.
There are a lot of people who are going to have financial problems.
If they were counting on it costing five million to build the house, now it's going to cost them seven.
I think some will wait," added Slivoň.
Copper, iron and also plumbing and heating equipment were the most expensive items.
Construction firms are also struggling with a shortage of labour.
There is a shortage of graduates in construction-related fields in the Czech Republic, and the influx of foreign workers has been slowed by the pandemic.
The situation is only more favourable in terms of issuing building permits.
"In October, building authorities issued 7,675 building permits, which is almost 10 per cent more than a year ago," said Křeček.
We are doing well, and we will do even better.
There is a lack of real vision, says ČRO – MujRozhlas commentator
In addition to the traditional New Year's Eve celebrations, the start of the new year has traditionally been accompanied by speeches by politicians.
This year, in addition to the Prime Minister and ANO leader Andrej Babiš and the Christmas message of President Miloš Zeman, the speakers of the Senate and the Chamber of Deputies also spoke to the nation.
What did we learn?
I find the Master's thesis super just like that, I have my own topic which I chose, I'm building on my Bachelor's thesis, I always work on it for a whole year and then I write the written part in a week or two.
The state examinations are completely calm here. If you're not a complete monkey and you have something left in your head, the commission will not unnecessarily suffocate you with the theory.
I studied for a week for the state exams and when I was at my wit's end, the commission always tried to guide me towards some kind of logical conclusion, which I immediately understood and which was correct.
Otherwise, to those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project for them (we've done it a lot, it's really beneficial, you learn a lot), and then they just learn the project and they're done.
In my opinion, it is great when, at the end of the course, there is an exam that reflects the knowledge acquired during the project, not just a defence.
All well and good but do not flood the embassy with emails and phone calls and do not send any parcels.
You'll be just like them.
Those people at the embassy may have nothing to do with it.
And if they were against Russia, they would risk a lot, so maybe they have to play with them, because otherwise something could happen to them.
But you could just as well put a similar statue of Putin next to the statue of Pú the bear.
However, it should be given to Xi Jinping in such a way that it reaches his backside, or something like that.
I agree, even though Insta is throwing a spanner in the works for artists.
If you don't post stories every day and at least a new picture every other day, your reach will drop to an absolute minimum.
On top of that, they keep changing what's more important, whether it's a like, a comment or a save.
I've been really frustrated lately, so maybe I'll have to go down to TikTok, where a lot of artists in my field are having success and they can't get enough of it.
I'd even be happy if something more user-friendly came along, that didn't suck all the creativity and energy out of artists
Statement of the Workers' Party of Donbass
The Union - yes, the break-up - no, say the opponents of the break-up of the USSR in the photo.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the USSR.
On December 8, 1991, the greatest geopolitical disaster in the history of mankind took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk, and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the referendum on March 17, 1991, with the open tolerant attitude of Mikhail S. Gorbachev, secretly, without regard to the people, signed an agreement that "the USSR as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist."
With a stroke of a pen they "abolished" a huge country with almost three hundred million inhabitants.
With the collapse of the USSR, tens of millions of ethnic Russian citizens found themselves abroad.
Since the start of the 1990s, Russia's population has fallen by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the non-Russian population of the former Soviet republics, we've already lost more people than in both world wars combined!
Even earlier, the same people, who in one session in the Bialowieza Forest destroyed what had been built in the previous seventy years, betrayed the socialist camp (created at the cost of millions of lives in the Second World War and in the Great Patriotic War).
They deliberately deindustrialised, slowed down agriculture, detached from the largest world power fourteen republics that were previously economically linked in a single mechanism.
If we look deeper, we see the impoverishment of the population, the collapse of the economy, science, the army, the growth of crime, inter-ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, the series of orange revolutions, the expansion of NATO to the east, the war and the break-up of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria – all of this is the result of the geopolitical capitulation, the first of the socialist camp, and then the Soviet Union.
There is such a term in political science as "power vacuum".
Everything that was hastily betrayed and abandoned quickly filled and took over the NATO countries that accepted our geopolitical capitulation.
And the whole world is still shaken by the events of the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a supermarket with a large turnover may not directly correspond to its quality and quality.
It is Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket that costs 189 CZK/kg.
I buy it with the intention of putting it in the fridge and making it into dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality in which I don't buy the meat on Monday, the chain will reduce its price to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - describe to me the mechanism by which the change in the price of the meat makes it a burden for my digestive system?
Or, I can wait until Thursday and the meat will be 1 day before its sell-by date and reduced to 69 CZK/kg - how would this meat differ from the meat I bought on Monday for 120 CZK more and left in my fridge for 3 days?
I'll answer myself - with nothing.
These things about the fact that if something is cheap, it must be definitely bad, spoiled or of low quality are really retarded, to be honest ;-)
Recently, I went to Hlavas in Brno and a lady was handing out some kind of brochure in the underpass. I always take things like that to help the volunteers, they can't just throw them away...
No, the pamphlet was full of common sense and conservative views on the way the world works, but there was nothing about God, I was confused, but I suspected it would be some kind of agitprop.
After reading it, I found out who published it and it turned out to be Scientology.
No, it was a good sailor, full of completely useless instructions, such as that I should wash and not be a bitch.
This is a waste of paper, forests would not have to be cut down for this.
I experienced something similar with my ex-girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will get you to comply with that person because you love them, without realising how bad the situation is.
She threatened to hurt herself because I went out to chat with a friend she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she started to cry and begged me on her knees not to leave.
She then began to physically block the door.
For about a year, it was a great relationship, but then another six months went by and it started to beat her up.
After that I ended the relationship with her by telling her that I was breaking up with her, but that we could talk about it next week to calm her down and so that she wouldn't go on another rampage.
Such a person will suck the city, emotions and overall joy out of you.
It's best to keep your distance
When insurance companies are frantically buying up clouds of tests and hunting for positives who wouldn't even know about the terrible disease if it wasn't for the test.
The only thing we are achieving is complicating things for companies, transport companies and others, because their employees fell into five days of home detention in the random number generator.
In the West, they have already stopped with this nonsense and have recognised that it is not worth dealing with a disease weaker than the famous flu.
Unfortunately, Válek is new and has to steal something and boost his ego by coming up with buzzwords.
I see that the old scoundrel is coming back.
After years of dormancy and suppression of this underhanded business, MLM recruitment is once again in the spotlight.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20 years old, a first-year university student), the initial promises of product and business skills training quickly turned into "it doesn't matter to you, just get people".
I was genuinely interested in the products I was selling as I wanted to help people, however, the training was more on how to scare and persuade people.
When the first money came in, you quickly realized that if you wanted to earn, you had to sell several sure products a month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only ways to make money, so you felt like a door-to-door pot salesman.
What I can say, however, is that it was a valuable experience, and I learned not to jump on every bit of information and to verify it thoroughly.
At the same time, I wouldn't lump everyone together.
There are people in this business who are successful and even helpful to people, but they certainly aren't going to brag about expensive consumer goods or "fat" bank accounts.
In the company where I work, I haven't experienced many such things.
HR is quiet, managers are minding their own business, and they're not sticking their noses into anything.
There is, however, a regular assessment, in the form in which it takes place in our country (set some goals for the next year, and a year later we'll look at what worked and what didn't) - it's more of a self-assessment, rather than someone assessing you according to some numbers, and so on.
Corporate events are also optional.
But we're a bit unique within our company - there are departments that are more "corporate".
Sometimes it feels like we're some sort of quasi-startup squatting in the offices of a large corporation.
But it doesn't bother us much as long as the results are there.
A Czech woman missing in Britain is dead.
Her body was found in London.
British police have been searching for a missing 32-year-old Czech woman for almost ten days.
On Sunday, December 12, the former Minister of Foreign Affairs, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that the woman from Uherské Hradiště had been found dead.
Unfortunately, the British police confirmed to our embassy in London this afternoon that the body of the missing Czech citizen has been found.
The cause of death is under investigation.
Out of respect for the family, we will not be releasing any additional information at this time.
My sincere condolences, wrote Kulhánek on Twitter.
The young woman was last seen on the 28th of November on a bus on her way home from work. Before getting on the bus, she withdrew money from an ATM.
Her disappearance was reported by work colleagues five days later.
She was then wanted by the London police, and Interpol listed her as missing worldwide.
It also appeared in the Czech database of missing persons.
The police arrested one man in connection with this a few days ago.
She did not say what role he played in the case or what he is suspected of.
Four municipalities elected new councils at the end of the year
On Saturday, 11 December, new councils were elected in the villages of Komňa in Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice in Mostecko, Nová Ves in Liberecko and Rovná in Pelhřimovsko.
The number of councillors in these municipalities has fallen below the legally required number or the elected councils have collapsed.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates competed for the 28 seats.
Turnout was 62.41%.
The highest interest was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters voted.
Eight women and 20 men were elected to the mandate.
The average age of the elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69 and the youngest is 33.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the new elections to the councils of the four municipalities.
Thirty-six women and 63 men competed for the 28 seats.
The average age of the candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22 and the oldest was 72.
Processing the results of Saturday's elections symbolically closes a rather demanding, but successful year for us.
Four new or repeated elections to municipal assemblies and above all very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies took place there.
We had to work in more demanding epidemiological conditions, which put greater demands on equipment and personnel, said Eva Krumpová, 1st Deputy Chairperson of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last precinct was reported at 3:49 a.m. on Sunday, December 12.
On Monday, the State Election Commission will discuss the results of the vote, and after approval, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
It took me a while at the very beginning to come to terms with the fact that we have a pretty dangerous contagious disease, but it went well.
Coming to terms with the fact that a large part of the population at all its levels is so idiotic about it is still a problem for me.
I am most looking forward to the vaccination (tomorrow!) because thanks to it I will finally be less dependent on the fact that other people are not assholes.
He would be removed from office and disqualified from ever holding it again.
However, as others have mentioned, the chances of this actually happening are very small.
In addition, I'm not sure whether the declassification of the file could be considered treason.
High treason is an act by which the president of the republic endangers the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It must have been something more serious.
How the pandemic has changed our love lives: Number of under-35s going a year without sex soars
More and more young adults in the U.S. are living their lives without sex.
This is mainly religious people, says the website of the DailyMail newspaper.
The survey showed that between 2008 and 2021, the proportion of people under 35 who abstain from sex increased from eight to 21 per cent.
The number of women aged between 18 and 35 who said they have not had sex in the past year is at an all-time high.
The decline in the number of sexually active individuals is due to other factors, according to a survey by the Institute for Family Studies (IFS).
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus pandemic and a higher unemployment rate.
However, the presence of the media, social networks or video games could also have played a part, making sex less of a priority for young people.
"From 2010, there has been a rapid increase in the share of men and women aged 18 to 35 who say they have not had sex in the past year," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
Those in married relationships are more sexually active, with just 5 per cent saying they had gone a year without sex in 2021.
Among the never-married, it was 29 percent. Stone added that marriages under the age of 35 are only a small percentage.
The decline in sexual activity is also due to the fear of premarital sex and religious background.
While married couples are more likely to be sexually active, the percentage of married and cohabiting men and women under 35 is still falling.
Young people are divided on premarital sex, with about 30% thinking it's a bad thing and about 70% thinking it's OK.
"It's true that they're a minority among free-living individuals in this age group, but their behavior is driving this trend," Stone said of the 30 percent.
Most of those who have a moral problem with premarital sex do so on religious grounds.
From 2008 to 2018, the rate of abstinence among unmarried people younger than 35 who attend religious services more than once a month rose from 20 percent to nearly 60 percent.
Among the "less religious," the trend rose from 10 to 20 percent," Stone said.
Other factors also contribute to the decline in sexual activity, such as less social interaction and especially social drinking during the pandemic.
The study also found that people who are unemployed or have lower incomes are less likely to have sex.
Another reason could be the expansion of digital media, which seems to reduce the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "substituting" for this need.
This trend has taken hold mainly during the lockdown in the time of the coronavirus pandemic.
The whole issue of vaccinating against Covid is whether a society should force part of its population to do something they don't want to do, but which may save their lives.
It's a pretty tough question, and the one I'm personally most interested in is the question of the social conscience.
That is to say, for example, the question of whether if we don't order them to do it and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could certainly be held responsible for the death of an 80-year-old man who really didn't know what he was doing, we didn't explain it well enough to him, he heard some misinformation, and as a result, he didn't get vaccinated and eventually caught it and died.
On the other hand, I don't think we can be held responsible for the death of a stubborn opponent of vaccinations, who is standing here next to the SPD and the KSČ, shouting something about bullying and a totalitarian state.
From those statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of unvaccinated pensioners probably belong to the second group, so they will be able to blame themselves for it.
Snowless Czechia.
How will a mild winter affect the fight against the drought?
This year's winter has so far brought one of the lowest snowfalls in recent times in the Czech Republic.
Ski resorts cannot do without artificial snow, and the weather also complicates the preparations for the Jizerská 50 cross-country race.
Is this a trend or an exception?
And what will a lack of snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it is not about the pan-fryer.
One time in middle school our teacher led us across town to the boathouse so we could take boats out on the river.
On the way there, we walked down a fairly wide street, and in the middle of it, we didn't see anyone - a follower of the Hare Krishna sect.
Of course, they came down on us.
I was lucky enough to escape, but one of my friends got into an argument.
When she left, we asked her and her teacher what she had told them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I don't have a soul," she replied.
We were all laughing all the way to the boathouse, including the teacher.
We're so pampered.
Not much is happening, but the system is collapsing, says Orozovič
New German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted with military honours by Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the meeting.
Scholz stressed that Europe must show together that it will not accept a violation of the territorial integrity of Ukraine.
The chancellor said that the crisis caused by the worrying movement of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border should be resolved through diplomatic negotiations, including within the "Normandy format" grouping France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said he informed the chancellor about the situation on the Polish border with Belarus, whose leader Alexander Lukashenko has artificially created a migration crisis and is using people as living targets and a weapon, because every night we record hundreds of attempts to (illegally) cross the border.
I spoke to the chancellor about further sanctions to make the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin finally understand that we are determined to defend the EU's eastern border.
Scholz, according to the DPA agency, assured that Warsaw can count on German support in its dispute with Belarus, and condemned the inhumane treatment of refugees by the Lukashenko regime.
Drunk Polish nun caused accident, tried to cover it up
After a while, the car returned to the scene of the accident, but it was being driven by a different nun who was trying to take the blame.
When the police told her that she could still lose her driving licence for not giving way and leaving the scene of the accident, she came clean, TVN24 reported.
She admitted that another nun, who asked her for help, hit the car.
The police then came for Celestina's sister.
She was breathalysed and her licence was immediately suspended after she was found to have more than two-and-a-half times the legal limit in her system.
At the same time, they notified her that she would be questioned about her actions in court.
Dog Hugo is doing what he can.
But Juraj Šajmovič did not keep an eye on his film.
Czech creators of family comedies have taken a liking to American stories about beloved pets.
But they forgot one important thing: the laws of filmmaking.
After the kitsch film F. Brabec's Gump - the dog who taught people to live, another film, Tady hlídáme my, is now competing for audience emotions in cinemas.
The film's co-screenwriter and director, Juraj Šajmovič jr., loosely follows his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking hedgehog Hugo returns to the scene, along with some of the familiar characters around him.
Julie and Ivan, the owners of a Šumava pension that is dying and so they start to invite dog owners, Julie's father with his partner and especially her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl but a young woman experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner, Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer), struggled with the storytelling in their previous dog film, but at least children and the dog were entertaining.
This time, the creative duo has written an even weaker script, which elicits a mixture of awe and feelings of embarrassment.
Let's recap.
Julie, despite being a scientist, succumbs to the darkness of her desire for a child and, when the "constellations" are right, copulates with her forest engineer, Ivan, wherever the coordinates indicate - on the bonnet of a car or a church tower (of course, during an ongoing tour with a local guide), the retired Colonel Mojmír, despite years of training, shoots his own daughter (Julie) in the forest, who falls into a coma, after which she is taken from the hospital by the family to undergo a miraculous healing process with a dog in the heart of the Šumava wilderness.
Nothing wrong with the restorative powers of nature and the strength of animal companions.
Their owners know why they have them.
The viewer is amazed at how much content pelmel full of unbelievable situations and figures was needed to convey this message.
A pair of thieves from the staff, a dog show, a charlatan from the Šumava, police arriving on a tip-off to look for "drugs" and discuss the fertilising power of bone meal - and of course, the overindulged family in the pension.
When the heroine wakes from a coma and is soon sitting at the family dinner table, made up and smoking a cigar, demanding her father's whisky and a slab of meat as a reformed vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
On top of that, the creators explain to the viewer that "this sometimes happens after a coma."
Šajmovič's team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with a text, the ability to build up the main situations, a sense for the characters and the point, and directorial guidance.
The acting is uneven, the editing is clumsy and the overall impression is muddled.
However hard Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková or Nela Boudová try to keep their parties afloat, they have little to play for.
The only good thing about the film are the poetic shots of the Šumava nature by cameraman Vladimír Holomek and the pair of stoats.
It's not enough to sketch out a few characters, a flimsy plot, and dog puns, not to mention the more common vulgarities the characters indulge in.
Long-standing membership of the Dachshund Club - as in the case of the producer - is also not an argument.
For good intentions to promote nature and the friendship between man and dog, there must also be knowledge of the trade, if one wants to tell a believable story.
This didn't work out in this case.
There's a bit too much erotica and a minimum of feeling for the genre in this family photo.
Even as a commercial for canine therapy, this amateurish piece would not pass.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to the constant insults from morons like you.
There is a difference between offering and forcing, here you can see how you do not understand this, but it is only because you have never tried it.
It's always up to the customer, if they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you listen to those kids all the time, you might change your mind.
It's work just like any other, in this case a side job.
The Middle East is experiencing unusually dry months.
Winter is the only time of the year when it rains.
"The almost total absence of rain during November, as recorded at some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service confirms.
For example, the village of Kfar Giladi in northern Israel reported just six percent of its long-term average rainfall in November.
This week's two-day rainfall was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It hasn't rained for a long time.
It's also the right Christmas setting, said Nazareth resident Wasim Ashkar.
Rainfall in Israel comes almost exclusively in the winter months, is sporadic and irregular.
Forests rely on winter rains.
Without them, they dry out and are susceptible to fires.
It is not just about forests, but also about drinking water resources and irrigation for farmers.
The largest freshwater source in Israel, the Sea of Galilee, filled to the brim this spring, thanks to three consecutive rainy winters.
Since then the level has fallen.
Hydrologists have been warning about the drought for a long time.
"It is expected that, depending on global warming and climate change, there will be less rainfall here," said Uri Schor, a spokesman for the Israel Water Authority, in 2018.
Israel can help itself with technologies such as desalination or wastewater recycling.
The economically weaker countries, such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan, are faring worse.
In the streets of Jordan's capital, Amman, tanker trucks are becoming more common.
Water pipes and private wells are drying up.
"This year, my orders have gone up by 70 to 80 per cent compared to the previous two years," said tanker driver Imad Suleiman in September.
Farmers clashed with security forces in the Iranian city of Isfahan.
The cause of the protests was the drought.
The bed of the local river was completely dry.
The region has experienced its driest November in many years.
Israel prepares military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks had failed to make "any progress" and that he had informed Washington of preparations for an attack on Iran's nuclear facilities.
Defense Minister Benny Gantz on Saturday said he had ordered the Israel Defense Forces to prepare for the possibility of a military strike against Iran, Jonathan Lis reports.
Gantz, who is in the United States, is trying to convince the Americans to step up the pressure on Iran, but is also informing Washington about the military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said that the nuclear negotiations in Vienna have not brought "any progress" and the world powers "understand that the Iranians are playing with them."
This also happened to me about 3 years ago.
I flirted a bit with the lady and grilled her during the interview to find out what she actually wanted from me.
In the end, I discovered that my suspicion of a pyramid scheme was justified.
Because I really don't like these tricks, I kept the lady waiting with doubts and questions for a while and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to call me a scoundrel, but a pyramid is a pyramid and a financial advisor is a financial advisor.
Skiers headed for the mountains at the weekend, where there was plenty of snow and good weather
The mountain resorts in the Czech Republic experienced their first major influx of skiing enthusiasts this weekend.
After heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no shortage of snow and some ski resorts have opened as a result.
The skiers were not deterred by the requirement to show their covid certificate at the lifts.
While tow-bar operators are not complaining about a lack of customers, some ski equipment rental companies are reporting lower demand for their services than before the epidemic.
Thousands of people hit the running trails and ski slopes in the Liberec region over the weekend.
Today, the weather was good for skiers, with sunshine and excellent snow conditions.
"We are pleased, the opening weekend really went well from Friday evening when we had the first skiers on the hill," said Jakub Hanuš, the Director of the Ještěd Sports Area.
Hundreds of people set out for the first weekend of skiing in the new season in the Jeseník Mountains.
Open were, for example, Ski Aréna Karlov or the centre in Branná in Šumperk.
Weekend attendance was very good, with an estimated 400 people on Saturday and today.
The conditions are great.
Today the sun was shining, it was about minus three degrees, so it was perfect, said Rostislav Procházka, the representative of the ski resort in Branná.
Ski resort operators can only sell ski passes to people who are vaccinated or have recently recovered from COVID-19.
People are generally prepared for this, and they show the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn ski centre to ČTK.
"We've only seen a handful of incidents," he added.
Some rental and ski equipment shops are reporting lower demand than before the pandemic.
Fortunately, there is interest in renting skis.
It's not like in previous years, but there are still enough customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Opava Skiopava store.
More pressure is expected during skiing courses.
David Šinták, the manager of the Hradec Králové company Snowbear, also feels that there is not as much interest in renting ski equipment as there used to be, due to the coronavirus.
By this time before the pandemic, we were almost booked out.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are at around 50 percent, Šinták told ČTK.
According to him, people have become lazy during the pandemic and have learned to sit at home.
By contrast, the Novako rental agency in Boží Dar is experiencing high demand.
They started renting out skis there a week ago and interested parties now have to book them in advance.
"We start renting skis this weekend, but people have been calling in advance, so we are expecting a lot of interest, just like last year," said area manager Pavlína Nováková.
According to her, interest comparable to the period before the epidemic is also in the ski school.
If we want successful and rich people not to leave the country, they must have the opportunity to live a quality life here as they do abroad.
Socialist health care, where it is often difficult to find a dentist or specialist doctor, is certainly not included.
Smart and skilled people who have no assets are leaving the country.
A business owner doesn't just up and leave the country.
But I agree with the rest of it.
If these people do not live well in the Czech Republic and if these people do not see a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they will not live in the Czech Republic.
Emigration from Hungary began when Orbán won one beautiful day, ruled for a year, and suddenly the annual emigration rose by a few tens of thousands.
It is naïve to think that the Czech Republic cannot find itself in a similar position from one day to the next.
Another question is whether there will be elections at all.
If it's going to be bad here, then a traditional V4 madman can also win.
The young and educated will leave, leaving behind his supporters and people whose assets don't fit into a plane.
Frightening photo!
Langmajer in blood due to a beer bet?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the film crew for the film Island, led by Jiří Langmajer (55), enjoyed the tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury, or is it acting for filming?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech woman.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Petra's disappearance is completely out of character and we are growing increasingly concerned for her," said Lucy O'Connor of Lambeth police, where Srncova worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and just wants to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work around 7.45pm on Sunday 28 November and headed home to the Camberwell area.
She was last seen getting on a bus about half an hour later.
Her disappearance was reported on 3 December by one of her colleagues.
According to British media, Srncová was working as an "assistant nurse" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We have grave concerns for our dear colleague Petra who is missing," the group of medical facilities said in a tweet.
"We are appealing for anyone who may have any information that could assist in finding her to contact police," the statement continued.
MP Harriet Harman, who drew attention to the case of the Deer on Saturday at a press conference, has also called on the public to cooperate.
"She's been missing for a few days, she's only 32 years old, she's from the Czech Republic, her parents are understandably distraught," the Labour politician said, holding a photograph of the woman distributed by London police.
"I feel like we all have a special responsibility to try to find her because she was out of her home country, away from her family, working here for our healthcare," Harman said.
Police have already arrested one man in connection with the case, who remains in custody.
However, the BBC reports that the police have not released any information about the man's identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia is not capable of occupying Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (i.e. about 5 divisions).
I don't underestimate Ukraine either.
These are not "huge amounts", but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Note that Ukraine is constantly repeating that we are overstating the threat of Invasion and is starting to get fed up with our involvement.
I quoted it above.
I don't know where he got the idea that Russia wants war.
War is a hell of a lot of fun, and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
The comparison to 1938 is so off in so many ways that I don't even know where to begin.
I can compare this to the First Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily :D
I could imagine that after Ukraine announced it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia annexes those ridiculous republics.
That's all there is to it, and that's what the "concentration" at the borders would correspond to.
Yes, pacta sunt servanda...
New timetables come into force in Prague on Sunday, affecting mainly suburban services
Passengers in Prague's integrated transport system (PID) can look forward to a number of changes from Sunday, mainly affecting suburban services.
New lines have been created, some have changed their routes, and others have disappeared.
Mladoboleslavsko is now joining the integrated system.
From Sunday, fast trains from České Budějovice will stop at the Zahradní Město station in the capital.
In suburban rail transport, S7 trains will run, which pass through Prague's main station on the route from Beroun to Český Brod.
The recently opened station of Prague-Zahradní Město will now be served by the R17 express train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
The PID will now be extended to other areas.
In addition, the buses will go as far as Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatná u Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses in the Mladá Boleslav region will be included, including lines with transfers to the Liberec and Hradec Králové regions.
During the integration, 77 lines will be scrapped, 37 new lines will be introduced and the operation of 12 existing lines will be changed.
A new bus line 405 will depart from Prague's Zličín. It will go all the way to Žatec.
A new direct connection between Prague and Kralovice near Rakovník has also been created, replacing the cancelled S53 train line.
The Prague-Rakovník connection will be strengthened in the morning rush hour and at the weekend, when a new express line number 404 will run.
New to the PID system are lines 400 and 410, which go to the Liberec region.
They leave from the Střížkov metro station, not from the Nádraží Holešovice station.
The 400 spine line runs through Mělník, Dubá and Česká Lípa to Nový Bor, and selected services continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The supplementary line 410 goes via Mělník and Dubá to Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné v Podještědí.
In contrast, the operation of dozens of local routes in the Central Bohemian region has been cancelled or restricted, including to Mochov, Dobříš or Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Due to the modernisation of the railway, there will be long-term restrictions on the tracks from Prague to Beroun, Prague to Lysá nad Labem, and in the vicinity of Kolín.
There will also be changes for passengers at other locations.
Buses are replacing some cancelled railway lines or the section of line 420 from Dobříš with connections from Prague, where it is possible to use PID tickets all the way to Milevsko.
The routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk have been changed, and the routes of some buses on the border of the Central Bohemian Region and Hořovicko in the Plzeň Region have been adjusted.
Healthy snack/lunch for the office from the supermarket
Hi, I work 9-5 with a 30min break and my only option to get food is to go next door to B&M or a bit further to Lidl.
Because I don't have any movement, after work I don't have the strength to exercise, so I have to eat as healthily and on a diet as possible.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy, and in a hurry, I'll buy, at most, a pizza roll, and for a snack, some yoghurt and an apple.
The question is: what healthy food that doesn't need to be cooked would you recommend that I buy at the supermarket?
Not everyone waits for a metre of snow like you do, unfortunately.
And it's not just trees that you need to see.
Only the top of the tree can be hidden under the snow.
If injured, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal diseases.
I'm not saying it's the only reason they don't allow us to ski off-piste, but it's one of them.
Dara's confession about her relationship with Nedvěd: I wasn't looking forward to this at all
The Czech showbiz pond has been alive with nothing but the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedvěd since Friday.
They've been together since the summer, and the famous footballer even got divorced for the singer.
Dara has now sent her fans a long message explaining why she kept her love a secret from them for six months.
"I dare to claim that no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia currently knows that Dara caught the bear, i.e. pardon, Nedvěd," jokes Dara Rolins, who is head over heels in love with the most successful Czech football player.
Apparently, he dumped her, not the other way around.
Three days are in the spotlight and although they are used to public interest, they don't enjoy it.
And it's here.
The thing we were both dreading, but knew was inevitable, continues the singer.
I just don't know who has it worse.
Whether it's those who don't care about it at all and it pops up for them even from a can, or us, whose lives are scrutinised in minute detail.
It's as if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether you and your spouse or partner are a good match, or if you insisted that everyone in detail know your list of former partners and be aware of the list of your errors and mistakes.
It's a żužo, you want it, it bothers Dara.
The couple got together in Italy, where Rolins went to prepare her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has been the vice-president of the Juventus football club for a long time.
They came out with the truth only now, because they were waiting for Nedvěd's divorce to be finalised.
He and his wife, Ivana, have been separated for three years, and have only been legally divorced for three weeks.
In any case, we thank those who rejoice with us and wish us well.
We are just people, we have families, children, pasts and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
For this reason I love my new man and just as he stands by me, I stand by him in good and bad times, concluded Rolins.
Hi, other commenters have probably said everything important, I just confirm that the dorms are great for the beginning, my fellow students usually get to know each other and become friends during the first semester or two, and then they find accommodation together, which I think is the best option, because you know who you will be living with.
Apartments are usually not advertised very far in advance, so you probably won't find much now, but it won't hurt to take a look at the offers.
Otherwise, definitely avoid not only Cejl, but also the surrounding area (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., that's a pretty bad address), and some parts of Židenice are a bit of a ghetto.
On the other hand, Veveří is very student-oriented, Královo Pole and the direction of Královo Pole is nice, and it's close to most of the VUT faculties (I don't know which one you're going to).
I have never looked for a rental, but I am a native of Brno, so I can give advice on Brno as such, if you need any more information.
This is an example of "normal" thinking to me.
It is actually okay that the state does not sufficiently finance some schools, because of what a few doctors have decided to do somewhere in Poland.
They can either learn what they want and pay for it themselves, or they can follow the state curriculum and the state will pay for it.
We cannot allow a private actor to take over a part of the education system just because they add a few crowns to the state contribution and can then teach what they want in the schools.
Such a statement loses some of its weight when it is written by a person who two days earlier expressed himself in this way about a petition calling for a boycott of a totalitarian state:
So your vote against someone having an abortion is the same as your vote against a statue standing in a square?
I would consult directly with the person who commissioned the work from you.
Otherwise, I have already seen, during the process of cataloguing and digitisation, that (even long-term professionals) either guess or write something like xxx *** or ... (according to convention) and in the note that it is illegible.
The truth is that in this case it's quite readable, so I wouldn't really recommend it.
Personally, I would deal with it in a comment, depending on which program you are using.
If you want to be a proper, diligent student, you can look up some branded databases and find the nearest one.
But since it looks like you are drawing from a book, I would guess that the author or the printer simply created their own symbol that fits with what is physically on the coin.
PS: It's not a coincidence that it's called the Odry Kingdom rather than the Odryska Kingdom, is it?
PSS: Someone has already solved it here.
Check out that comment with ΦΙΛH
Politicians have no idea what will be the "theme" of our presidency.
That is a much bigger scandal than having an interpreter with them.
The idea that they would pass something because nobody understood some text is laughable.
All important approved documents are examined word for word, and basic knowledge of English is not enough for that - it is the job of lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in various EU institutions, and English is more useful to politicians for informal contacts and the establishment of above-average relationships.
Moreover, with the English language, it is quite interesting, after the GB's exit from the EU.
I don't understand the hate towards Ceylon.
I've been working there for three years now and it's all good.
How many times do I drive home from work at 10 p.m. and there's never been a problem.
Only someone who has hardly ever set foot there can say that it is a ghetto.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno live there, but all they do is get in the way on the pavement and park where they shouldn't. It's definitely not the case that I'm afraid to go out there in the evening.
So, if you are looking for a relatively cheap place to live with good access to the city centre, I would go for it.
There are a lot of newly-renovated or newly-built flats there now.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and his mistress Gelemová as a stick in the fence!
Who will he spend Christmas with?
On Sunday, most people lit the first candle on the Advent wreath, Felix Slováček did not.
I don't have an Advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I've seen the wreath and Lucie certainly has one too, said the saxophonist to Blesk, thereby confirming Patrasová's words that he often visits her.
He visits, but does not live in their house in Vinohrady, where Dáda was left alone after his departure.
Slováček still does not know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
We recently met up with Anička, Felix and both grandchildren.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we still talked to each other, so Christmas didn't happen.
I really don't know where I'll be.
I buy gifts all the time, and I'm definitely going to buy something for Dad and Lucie, probably a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who came to the music video premiere in the Richman club himself.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
I always find someone to have a good time with, says Slováček, who was happy to meet Luďka Sobota's wife, Adriana, or singer Kamila Nývltová.
And he made it very clear.
And we are Iceland, so that we can afford not to have soldiers or weapons?
I doubt that anyone will defend us, and our location is so strategic that an aggressor would have to be a complete idiot not to occupy this territory.
And I don't understand why this should be a bad argument, can you explain that to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be deployed in hospitals in a crisis.
There are not enough police officers and they can't afford it, the same goes for firefighters, and nowhere else is there such a high percentage of health-trained people at such a high level.
The fact that our army is capable of defending just enough of Ostrava is a slap in the face of previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for a long time.
A record-breaking drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies, the landscape is not just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is experiencing the worst drought in years.
According to scientists, there is less water in mountainous and sub-mountainous areas, and places that have not yet experienced a water shortage are also recording less rainfall.
The cause of the drought that is affecting large parts of Central Europe is climate change.
But the effects are also exacerbated by the way we manage the soil.
What to prepare for in connection with the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
Yeah, it's going to be like that, I can barely stay on my skates on the ice, I know what it is to play hockey and the tactics (which I tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) are also generally a load of rubbish.
And whether you're a "bear Russia" hockey team or a "llama China" team, losing by two goals when you don't have to win the game is different than when it's level.
But as it is, what I hear from Czech commentators who point out what the referees notice and don't notice, whether it's men's or women's hockey, it's all strange, but that's probably how it is with all sports, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
Controversy is everywhere.
And, in my humble opinion, if it had been the other way around, it would have been the same as always, and that the Czech Republic has lost more often than it has won against Russia, it would have been the classic "they lost" vs "WE won".
Coronavirus: Russia's caseload exceeds 10 million
On Saturday 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily infections.
5766 people are hospitalised.
In total, 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, another 74.
In the last 14 days, there are 1,967 confirmed cases per 100,000, 871 per 100,000 in the last week.
The number of infections in Russia exceeded 10 million on Sunday.
Over the past 24 hours, 29,929 new infections have been registered.
It's the lowest daily figure since October 13.
The total number of registered cases in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest daily death toll since late October.
The UK is facing an "inevitable" large wave of infections caused by Omicron, Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, said on Sunday.
New quarantine measures will be needed.
There are already people hospitalised with omicron in the UK, and Hopkins expects that number to rise.
So far no one has died from the omicron variant, but hospitalisations occur about 14 days after infection and deaths about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson appeared to have broken the law by holding a Christmas quiz at Downing Street in December last year, when a lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One minister in Johnson's government has defended the quiz as having taken place "virtually" on a computer.
However, it was attended by groups of staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
In Britain, pressure is growing for Johnson to step down as prime minister.
Last December, when London was under a tight lockdown and Christmas parties were banned, Mr. Johnson's ministers held a series of drinks parties despite the lockdown.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government are making a mockery of them:
Paul Brand, ITV's political editor for the UK: Two years ago today, Boris Johnson won a huge majority in a general election.
This morning the Conservative Party is talking about him being removed from the post of prime minister.
Remarkable how quickly things have developed.
Want to turn it around and save your skin?
Hungary faces elections in the spring that could end Viktor Orban's 12-year rule.
They will be elections of European significance.
How fair can you expect them to be?
They won't be fair.
They will probably not be free either, as the last two elections under Orbán were not.
His Fidesz party controls the media, changes the boundaries of electoral districts to its advantage, and does other small or large tricks.
The latest one sounds as if everyone can choose in practice where they want.
This will allow Fidesz to bring voters from decided districts into those where the result is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So I will just repeat that they will not be fair at all.
Do you think it will be as unfair as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is entirely different.
In the past, the question was not whether Fidesz would win, but by how much, and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now there is a real chance that the unified opposition will win more seats and votes.
This is unusual for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they play even harder in an effort to keep their power?
Yes, we've got some hints that they're prepared to go beyond what they've done so far.
Recently, a recording of the Speaker of Parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, László Kövér, was leaked to the independent media, where he explained to the heads of the secret services that the opposition was a threat to national security.
Are those the hints of a new approach you're talking about?
Yes, it is one of those new things.
It all starts with the tongue.
I was hit quite often, the last time when I was 14, my mum doesn't have much patience, neither do I, my dad has patience for a long time, but then he hits me extremely hard (only in connection with me).
At the same time, I am very choleric and I used to get very angry when I was little, to the extent that I would lie on the floor in convulsions and turn blue, and they had to take me under the shower twice to calm me down.
They would sometimes reprimand me, sometimes it was more that they didn't know what to do.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things by violence now as well. I used to fight a lot when I was little, now I at least hit something to let off some steam, and when I was younger, I used to slap my parents across the hand, for example (so that I didn't get a proper beating), so I've never done anything extreme, but I always have this urge.
I'm not sure to what extent this is due to my temper, but I'm sure the upbringing has something to do with it.
I'm afraid that I will also lose my patience with my children and deal with it in the same way.
I think it's just wrong to hit children, and my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not at that moment, when it wasn't "educational," but out of frustration. On the other hand, I think every parent makes mistakes, it's probably not possible to not offend their children at least a little, so I don't hold it against them.
I'm not offended by it, I don't understand why the OP should be ashamed.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call Kundas those who make laws of such quality.
Otherwise, I'd like to know if you're afraid of losing your income?
Can you really count on the fact that people want the product and buy it, and will you be able to pay off your mortgage?
Kočner's monstrous world.
Where will Slovakia move the trial of the murderers of journalist Kuciak?
In Slovakia, the main trial in the case of the murder of Ján Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová has begun.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner has changed Slovakia.
It has mobilised civil society, but it has also revealed the practices of the accused businessman Marian Kočner and his connections with the top echelons of Slovak politics and justice.
What will the process mean for Slovakia?
The journalists are to blame for this.
How is it possible that this petition had a lot more media attention than the counter-petition of the deans of all medical faculties, which came out a day or two later?
No, they were left in the lurch and the company got away with it.
In the Czech Republic, people were dying of COVID-19 even half a year ago.
Another government ends and the law on the involvement of municipalities in the selection of a repository nowhere
Minister Karel Havlíček's proposal needs a major overhaul
The Andrej Babiš government is coming to an end and the law that was supposed to guarantee respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens in the selection and approval of a deep geological repository for high-level radioactive waste still does not exist.
The government's legislative council suspended discussion of the proposal, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade submitted to the government after years of delays.
Its content, however, is in serious conflict not only with the affected municipalities associated in the Platform against deep storage, but also with the Association of Towns and Municipalities of the Czech Republic.
Councils are expecting a significant strengthening of their decision-making powers on storage facilities, which has been promised to mayors since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began, and which is required by the Czech atomic law and the European directive.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in accordance with its coalition agreement, in cooperation with the municipalities.
The draft law by Minister Karel Havlíček, which is available to the Platform, is criticised by municipalities mainly for: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process on the selection of the site for the repository is insufficient and cannot ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the community or the public can influence whether the process goes ahead in a particular location.
This can be ensured by imposing an obligation on the Administration of Repositories to request the approval of the affected municipalities prior to the commencement of a specific procedure.
The proposed draft of the spatial plan almost completely ignores the involvement of the public and makes the citizens of the municipalities little more than mere statistics in permit proceedings.
The draft does not include the systemic setting of compensation for municipalities for the entire process of finding and selecting a site for a repository, its approval and operation.
According to today's legal rules, representatives of municipalities do not have many options to defend the interests of their citizens when looking for a place for a storage facility.
Only in some permit proceedings can they submit their comments or appeal, but it is the authority or minister in whose interest the permit is to be issued that makes the decision.
A potential lawsuit does not have a suspensive effect on the carrying out of survey or construction works.
The co-determination of self-governing bodies, which the Platform is calling for, is a principle that is commonly used in many democratically developed countries, and certainly in those that have already made progress in allowing storage, such as Sweden or Finland.
The preparation of the law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external law firms to prepare legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which was signed by SÚRAO, following contracts with the lawyer Jan Zemánek.
According to the register of contracts, the total sum for this work is almost 4 million Czech crowns.
Antonín Seknička, deputy mayor of the village of Cejle in the Hrádek area and spokesman for the Platform Against Deep Geological Repository, said: After the ministers of industry, who only postponed the settlement of the position of self-governing bodies vis-à-vis state authorities in the search for a deep geological repository for highly radioactive waste to their successors, we are waiting for a more significant turnaround from the new government.
We are also offering a helping hand.
We would also like to thank the Association of Municipalities, which perceives the issue of the insufficient rights of municipalities in such a major project in a similar way as the directly affected municipalities in selected locations.
The platform against deep disposal unites 51 members (35 municipalities and cities and 16 associations) to promote a change in the state's approach to the management of spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to deep disposal.
The platform further argues that the decision on the choice of the location for possible storage should be subject to the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
The fear of John Goodman (69) forced him to lose weight: He lost 90 kg.
Although he didn't feel the need to change his lifestyle for years, he was eventually scared straight by doctors.
He was told he would die if he didn't lose weight.
And that took time.
Goodman has lost a total of 90 kilograms, which is half of his original weight of 180 kilograms, according to The Sun.
He revealed his new look in Los Angeles at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers.
He's a totally different person from the fat guy on Roseanne!
John liked to joke that his friends and family asked him to lose weight because his large body was causing furniture to break.
"I was putting everything in my mouth," the actor said in a 2018 interview with AARP.
This time I wanted to do it slowly.
Move, exercise.
I'm at an age now where I can't afford to sit still, Mr. Goodman told ABC, whose transformation is remarkable.
Also, it depends on what kind of boss and in what context you want to use the word "boss".
If it's some text on a platform that expects readers from the gaming environment, I wouldn't translate it at all.
If it was, for example, a formal text and perhaps a university one, I would probably look for a way to describe or explain the boss.
What's more, there are different types of bosses.
For example, a game like Dark Souls has several bosses, right, and so a "boss" is like a lord/ruler of a given level, and then there's the final boss...
In many games, there are hidden bosses (super bosses, hidden bosses) that are not necessary to defeat in order to complete the game or level, but are often stronger than regular bosses.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but the player doesn't fight them directly (Tentacle, Gargantua), and can they be called bosses at all?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
To translate the word "boss" in one word is just not possible. Czech and other languages do not have a word for it (Catalan is an interesting example, which translates "boss" as the final opponent).
It's a computer-controlled opponent that is significant to the story or the game in general, stronger than all previous ones, and guarding the completion of some level or task.
The whole world is looking for Petra from London.
The Czech police were also involved.
Since 3 December, the British police have been looking for the missing Petra Srncová.
The Czech police also got involved in the search.
She has been looking for the 32-year-old woman from Uherskohradišťsko since 7 December.
Interpol is also helping the British police.
Petra Srncová was last seen by her colleagues on 28 November.
British police have been looking for her since 3 December.
Interpol issued a so-called "yellow notice" for her.
So, the whole world is looking for Petra.
"The Czech police closely cooperate with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We're sharing information on the case," she added.
The announced search for Petra has already appeared on the police website.
She is 168 centimetres tall, thin, has brown eyes and long straight hair of the same colour, he said.
It is supposed to come from Uherskohradišťsko.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her because it is very unusual for her to disappear
Local MP Harriet Harman was involved in the search for Petra.
She got involved in putting up leaflets with Petra's face on them.
"We are extremely concerned about her," she said at a Saturday news conference.
British police have arrested one suspect in connection with the disappearance.
However, it is not clear who he is and what he had in common with Petra.
Agent Tesla is terrorising pre-Christmas Czechia.
While data in October indicated a slight decrease in attack campaigns, last month saw a significant uptick as the end of the year approached.
We observed a major Agent Tesla campaign on November 18.
The attacks are targeted at the Czech Republic.
For now, the attackers' strategy remains the same.
The infected attachment in the email is designed to catch the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
While last month's dangerous attachment had the word "invoice" in the name, this time it was marked as Copy of receipt for 11,2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
The spyware includes features that scan web browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook, Mozilla Thunderbird, and Yandex email clients.
The malicious code actively searches for saved login details, which it then sends to the attackers.
The last major campaign in the Czech Republic took place at the end of August and the beginning of September, and with the approaching holidays and the end of the year, the activity of the attackers is growing again.
In November, the spyware Formbook remained active.
In contrast to Agent Tesla, in this case the attackers are not specifically targeting the Czech Republic, and the security experts detected more of a global campaign in November.
Compared to Formbook's October data, it weakened slightly in November, but still accounts for nearly a fifth of all detections.
The attacks were continuous throughout the month with increased activity on the 3rd, 10th, and 15th of November.
The formbook most commonly contained an attachment with the .exe extension named REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
However, the term receipt continues to be used.
The attachment in Czech is then much more dangerous for the Czech user.
Security analysts have observed a significant decline and a slowdown in the activity of the Fareit programme, which was responsible for 1.6 per cent of attacks and has not carried out a major attack campaign in the Czech Republic for several months.
Today's demolition of smart people who don't need oxygen because oxygen is for vaccinated idiots.
The rally in Prague was bigger than the media reported.
According to footage of the parade along the embankment and according to my experience, I estimate the number of demonstrators to be around 10,000 people.
People in the procession filled the embankment and bridge and the opposite embankment road.
This means that there are really a lot of people.
An unprecedented number of passers-by spontaneously join the procession of about four thousand protesters.
I believe that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
That persistent discontent among several large groups or layers of the population led to them finding common ground.
The anti-vaxxers, anti-maskers and the like would not be able to fill or pay for such a large procession.
The activities of the Chcípl pes association have rising popularity, it reminds me of Million Moments for Democracy.
Sometimes I get the impression that they even rent the same stage and equipment.
It's hard to say what kind of movement could emerge from this discontent, depending not only on the influx of money, but also on whether Pfizer's three-dose vaccine becomes a four- or more-dose vaccine.
It will certainly not be a left-wing or centrist movement, you can bet on that.
The three-dose vaccine is almost certainly going to become multi-dose as it's clear we're going to have to be re-vaccinated every six months.
I'm very glad that the vaccines have saved us.
It is a brilliant move by the scientists, which humanity is right to be proud of.
Out with the old, in with the new: Bulgaria gets new PM pledging change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has tasked Kiril Petkov from the anti-corruption movement We Continue the Change, which won the November elections, with forming a new government.
He has already managed to put together a broad coalition government that is expected to take office in a few days.
The political crisis in the country has been going on since April, when the previous government lost elections under the pressure of anti-corruption protests.
The victorious parties promising to fight corruption and abuse of power, however, were unable to agree, leading to a second early election.
What do cats do when no one is watching?
It has become a global hit after being "secretly" filmed.
Fears for the fate of a 32-year-old Czech woman, who has been missing in Britain for several days, grew over the weekend.
Petra Srncova was last seen two weeks ago on her way home from work in the south of the British capital.
In addition to the police, her former employer and a member of parliament who represents part of London where she lived are also calling for information about the children's hospital worker.
"Petra's disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor from Lambeth Police, where Srncova worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and just wants to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work at about 7:45 p.m. on Sunday, November 28, and headed home to Camberwell.
She was last seen on a bus about 30 minutes later.
Her disappearance was reported on December 3 by one of her colleagues.
According to British media, Srncová worked as an "assistant nurse" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are deeply concerned for our dear colleague Petra, who is missing," the group of medical facilities said in a tweet.
"We are appealing for anyone who may have any information which could assist in locating her to contact police," the statement continued.
Zdeňka Dvořáková Kocourková, an amateur painter of children’s rooms from Šumperk (and also a regional Pirate councillor) was reported by an anonymous person for violating the author’s rights by painting children’s rooms.
However, the court ruled that Krteček's paintings in the Šumperk rooms do not breach the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, there has been a hole in the road in the form of a channel without a lid for a month.
It was a matter of life and death.
The magistrate referred the complaints to the Road and Motorway Directorate, which owns the road, and since it allegedly did not react, the hole continued to grow.
In the end, the authorities clarified responsibilities and ownership, and after a month, ŘSD began to "deal with the situation intensively".
